
                   Garza is cool and fun to listen to. She makes it fairly interesting. She randomly takes extra credit attendance and gives extra credit assignments. Take notes and read your text and you'll be set.
                
                   Garza is a great professor by far my favorite professor I have had in my four years in college. It is very important you go to the lectures and pay attention if you do not you wont pass (she gives random attendance sheets for extra credit). Her tests are difficult if you dont pay attention, so mainly show up to class. AWESOME professor!!no textbook
                
                   This prof will do anything to make sure you are prepared for real life situations. She is enthusiastic and dedicated to academia. I hope to have this professor again!
                
                   You don't actually have to learn anything, just regurgitate her opinions.  Whatever happens, do NOT disagree with her!  I thought sociology would be more interesting than it actually was in class.
                
                   She is among the best profs ever.
                
                   I found Professor Kunz to be fairly easy. I do like to write though so if you are not a fan of writing short papers (about a paragraph or two in length) then take someone else. However if you can apply yourself and actually give your input in discussions you will make an A. 
                
                   You have to use the book she wrote.  Which wouldn't be so bad if it wasn't full of grammatical and punctuation errors.  WT has an underwater basket weaving class and this is it.  What a joke.
                
                   She makes 7:30am statistics fun and exciting.  Take her!
                
                   Awesome
                
                   Good stuff
                
                   knows her stuff
                
                   Great Class on Stats.
                
                   She knows her stuff!  Take her classes
                
                   Interesting on-topic lectures and cracks some jokes here and there which are pretty funny. Seems to be interested in students. I rarely talk in class and forces me to talk. She also does that to rest of her students. Tests are mostly from the book and study guides posted on the WT website. Tedious homework assignments. Good professor.
                
                   Great and Understanding and Funny
                
                   excellent
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Took class at Weber, felt like she didn't really adapt to a transition from teaching at Texas A&M. Class work had a lot of group projects (good and bad aspects) but wasn't too bad, although I'm not a fan of group-work. On tests prepare to memorize loads of minor details and facts. Covered topics in book but gave different info, a little annoying.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   She understands that most of the students in this class will go on to Law School, not become full time Sociologists.  If you put forth a noticeable effort, she guarantees the C you need to graduate.
                
                   Dr. Is probably the most involved Prof at A&amp;M.  There is nothing she cares more about than undergrads.  She is brilliant, and always willing to help!
                
                   AMAZINGGGGG!  314 is probably the best class offered at A&amp;M.
                
                   Definitely one of the hardest classes I have ever taken. But take it from Dr. A if you want to learn it.
                
                   I got a B, but I found this class to be dreary and some of her opinions seemed to make me incredibly depressed.  I wouldnt take her again.
                
                   Awesome teacher.  Gives extra points for showing up to class.  She gives you two options, do either 20 hours of community service or read 3 extra books to write a paper on at the end of the semester.  Gives 4 tests but lets you drop one.  Great class!
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Material is difficult, but she makes it digestible.
                
                   All the lecture power points were posted on ecampus, and all of the tests including the final was take-home with question word for word from the lecture power points. Class wasn't mandatory but if you went it was well worth it as he tried very hard to make it interesting and involve students. Would take again
                
                   Billy Brocato has been my favorite professor I have ever had. He is so great, honestly I am going to take him for SOCI 329 & am so excited since i took him for SOCI 205. He's not your average professor he's actually amazing.
                
                   He is a good prof who is passionate  about teaching . He tries to make sure that you walk out of his class knowing  your material. 
                
                   I have loved Professor Brocato. He is such a great lecturer as well as cares for each of his students. No quizzes, just three tests and two papers. All are pretty fair and not too hard at all! Loved him. Would defiantly take him if you can. 
                
                   Best professor for sociology. Definitely take him if he's available. You'll struggle if you don't go to class though.
                
                   SO glad I took Brocato for Sociology. He's not your average professor; although sociology isn't that interesting, his lectures are. He likes class participation. Tests can be a little tricky but he reviews them so there's no way you shouldn't pass. Def take him for soci 205.
                
                   Funny, witty, interesting lectures(well as much as they can be), and a strait up feeling that he cares about your mastery of the material.  Stands out from the normal professor.  Take this guy if he is available.  Its a fun class that isn't too demanding  and has some cool concepts that will help you no matter your major.
                
                   Easy class but very boring. No one paid attention and she uses questions off the review. The book helps clarify topics but it's a lot of reading. Pay attention to a few presentations at the end of semester because some questions are over them. I learned that the hard way.
                
                   She's a nice lady and her class is really easy, but I don't think she knows a whole lot about Sociology.
                
                   He makes too many mistakes when it comes to scantron tests. Final grade factors in pop quizzes that are biased and wordy. Not recommended.
                
                   good teacher, but has his opinions that wont be changed. Very refreshing way of teaching, says it how it is and doesnt care if it offends anyone. His focus is racial issues so if you dont like that kind of thing don't take his class.
                
                   Easy journal entry every week. 3 out of class activities are required. two written tests (easy). Prof is over the top liberal, take with grain of salt. great class though. learned a lot. Easiest A in college. got a 100. He does take attendance though.
                
                   Truly concerned about students' learning the material.  Textbook is easy to understand.  Readings come primarily from here.  Attendance isn't mandatory, but pop quizzes are given, so go to class!  If you need help, she is willing to meet with you outside of class and office hours when you are available.
                
                   This class was fairly easy if you kept up with the readings.Some weeks had a lot of reading, but most of the time it was just a text chapter/week.She likes discussion&encourages students2relate things2real life.She challenges you to think differently@gender.Focus is on women&inequality.She has a good sense of humor.Good class overallAttendQuizGiven
                
                   I hated the class most of the time, but not that hard. TOO  MANY PAPERS! Lots of discussion in class... She LOVES ppl with strong opinions.
                
                   This is just an intro class to Sociology but it's not too difficult. There is a lot of reading required but Prof. Guazzo makes it somewhat entertaining by having class discussions and having guest lecturers. It's an interesting class and it's easy to pull off a B no problem
                
                   He was really chill and had really fun assignments. you are guaranteed at least a C so long as you turn everything in and don't skip, but it is a very easy B if not A. He is also really understanding and if you just talk to him about any issues with an assignment or something he always very considerate. I highly recommend taking him.
                
                   Puts NOTHING online, had completely unrelated books linked to the class on the bookstore, and has long, very difficult to follow lectures. The upside to this class is having more interesting assignments than papers (poems, posters) that arent that hard to do. Difficult to keep track of your grades though, as he doesnt use ecampus at all. 
                
                   This was one of my favorite classes I have taken so far! There is a lot of material but Dr. Eason keeps things very interesting. There is never a dull moment during his lectures. Attendance is not mandatory but HIGHLY recommended because he does random participation points. I would take take a class from him again! 
                
                   Great Professor! This class was very fun. As far as grades go you have 3 tests and a reaction paper every week. Reading is recommended. He likes to talk about reading in class. Overall not a hard class if you just go to class or read what days you miss.
                
                   Awesome prof!! Loved the course. BE SURE TO READ AND ATTEMD HIS LECTURES. They are not boring and he expects you to be able to discuss what you read. Gives points for participation and points for weekly writings about anything that pertains to the subject. Great guy, down to earth, with a cool sense of style and good attitude. Def recommended
                
                   Very passionate. 3 tests, not final that are mostly multiple choice and one short answer. A lot of people complained because his lectures would sometimes just be over viewing the chapter assigned, but it helped you understand it better. Interesting discussions and shows movies and shows. weekly reflection papers about anything related to the class
                
                   No Comments
                
                   John is a great instructor. He really connects with the students since we are essentially from the same generation. The writing assignments are really simple and his exams are easy if you study. Pay attention in lecture, take notes, understand his power points and you will very likely make an A. It's a great class and I highly recommend!
                
                   Remember those teachers that have inspired you to be in school and remind you about the importance of getting an education? This is one of those teachers, he quite frankly was one of the few reasons why my first couple of weeks at A&M weren't completely hellish. He goes above and beyond to make a connection with you, could not recommend enough!
                
                   Look no further, TAKE THIS CLASS!!! He's really young and a grad student, but really funny and I learned more in this class than I have in a long time. Added bonus, he actually treats you like a real person. Also always willing to answer questions and loves to hear students opinions. Actually inspired me to change my major. 
                
                   Best Sociology Instructor.
                
                   Absolutely hilarious professor. Tests are straight from the lecture, and he emphasizes what he will for sure put on the test. It's impossible not to pay attention to his lectures and stories, unless you don't show up to class, which won't hurt you. He does give out test questions that only those who attend lecture will know the answer to.
                
                   John is a really cool guy. He is not there to fail you; he wants his students to succeed. He makes lectures really fun and interesting so that you remember the information. He loves testing on names. He gives restaurant recommendations which are all totally good. 
                
                   John really cared about making Sociology fun and engaging and i always enjoyed his class! Show up to class and you will be fine! Highly recommend taking him!
                
                   He is super helpful and really just wants you to be in class and participate and he gives reviews for his test and post all his notes online, he is really helpful. You have a few writing assignments but they are only a page long. I recommend taking him!!
                
                   This class is very reading intensive. Her exams test how well you can remember each reading. Most of her lectures comprise of summaries of the reading and class discussions. She assigned a group project at the end of the semester that was not listed in the syllabus. As long as you read you should be able to succeed in the class.
                
                   Prof Malone was awesome and super chill! However, sometimes his lectures were long and dry and take your laptop cause he doesn't sent out his PP's. Has a good sense of humor and really enjoyed discussions. Tests were online and he gave a review and we played Jeopardy the class before the test which offered bonus points. Would definitely take again!
                
                   Hilarious teacher! Makes learning the information enjoyable and easy to understand. Tests are a little difficult but he provides a study guide which helps a lot. Also the final is optional which is a huge plus.
                
                   Professor Mathey is a really awesome teacher. He's engaging, and his lectures are interesting. If you have issues with homework or other circumstances, you could come talk to him and he'll work through them with you. I wish I had a reason to take more sociology classes. He's a really great teacher.
                
                   Mr. mathey is really the nicest guy ever and he tries his absolute hardest to make class interesting-- however, if you're looking for an interesting deviance class to take.. this is not the one. Although the readings are necessary, they are doable and they're only required for class discussion. The tests are based off of solely notes so go to class
                
                   Professor Mathey is a very helpful professor. His lectures are engaging and he moves at a good pace that keeps you interested. Overall he is a very nice guy and tries to get to know everyone's name in the class. There are a few assignments that are worth a large part of your grade but he grades well and provides great feedback. Tests are not bad. 
                
                   The reason why this class is an easy A is because he gives 2 essay tests and 1 research paper. He gives a list of 10 questions on his pretest and then selects 4 for the actual test. You get to choose 2 to write on for the test. They are open-note tests, so it's easy. He will check your answers before the test if you ask. The paper is pretty simple.
                
                   SUPER EASY. he emails you the notes. If you need to up your GPA this is def a good class to take.
                
                   Very easy class!! Take him!! Literally just sat there and took notes. Cheat sheet for both exams and project is easy. I never read any books.
                
                   This class was super easy! All you do is go to class and get the lecture notes. He let us use a cheat sheet for the exams!
                
                   best prof I've had at A&M. he is brilliant & has a passion for sociology that translates in his lectures. class isn't hard if you pay attention and get engaged in conversations. definitely recommend taking Mestrovic!!
                
                   Hands down the best professor I have taken at A&M. He engages you in lectures and applies all theories to everyday life. He does a fantastic job explaining everything you need to know for exams. An all around AWESOME professor. His class is one of the few I actually looked forward to attending. I definitely recommend taking Mestrovic!!
                
                   Awesome teacher!!!
                
                   Great guy as long as you are active in discussions.
                
                   This professor is a true conservative with a passion for everything America stands for. In addition, he is a tireless advocate of both the U.S. military and capitalism both of which he believes the rest of the world should in envy of.
                
                   do not leave A&M without taking this professor.  This guy is absolutely brilliant and presents material to you in a way that will transform you in ways you never thought possible.  i never missed a class in two semesters.  it changed my life. best prof i had at A&M.
                
                   NO ATTENDANCE POLICY! Best Sociology professor at A&amp;M.  After a test, if you can prove a reason why you answered a question a certain way, the whole class gets credit.  I scored 26 extra points on a test that way.  Somewhat controversial, but one of the United States' foremost experts on post-modernism.  Fascinating lectures, and the reason why I majored in SOCI.
                
                   He is a fantastic professor who really fueled my interest in the subject. It is a very manageable class. Two tests and one group project. He really makes the class fun. I definitely recommend him as a manageable and interesting international elective.
                
                   Take Prof Ortega! He's a really nice guy. Says he is going to have pop quizzes, but then always would send out an email beforehand saying when they would be so we could study and be there. He also posts his powerpoint notes online so it's really easy to get away with not to class. Tests can be kinda tricky, but he gives tons of extra credit.
                
                   Ochoa is a kind, thoughtful, fun professor. She cares about the class and is quick to help if you ask. To be honest I'm all about an easy A, but after the first test I realized that wasn't going to happen with her. She is tough, but fair. She will give you the grade you deserve. Be prepared to learn a hard lesson if you don't do the work.
                
                   I liked Ochoa, she's nice and really chill. Her tests are a bit hard (75 questions) but if the majority of the class misses a certain question, she's likely to give the points back for it. Three tests and a final "media presentation" where you give a presentation about soci in the media and write a 5-10 page paper over it. Don't miss class.
                
                   I would recommend anyone to take Ochoa. She is quick to respond  and helpful if you ask for assistance . Test are not too difficult as long as you take adequate notes and if a large amount of the class misses a question she is open to giving back points, also she gave an extra credit opportunity.  The final presentation/paper isn't bad at all.
                
                   Professor Ochoa is nice but lectures can be boring. She expects you to have your chapters read before class, takes attendance, gives three tests and the final is a media presentation (yes, you must present it to the class) along with a 5-10 page paper. Her tests are kind of tough; 75 questions of which 15 are true/false. Not an easy A. :/
                
                   Kind of a push over. Changed our syllabus halfway through the semester because our first test was screwed up. Stay on top of the readings. For me it was an easy A even without the extra credit. Wants students to succeed. Lectures can be boring sometimes, but overall good. Every other class time students present, so half the time she isn't teaching.
                
                   She certainly makes class interesting.  She is pretty opinionated, but she knows what she is talking about.
                
                   I would not take this teacher unless you really need this class. She has very strong opinions and if you do not share them you are setting yourself up for failure. She talks about going out and drinking with friends and getting wasted. Im not in high school save your stories for a more appropriate place
                
                   Anything with April Plemons is going to be interesting. If you need a SOCI credit, take her!
                
                   I'm not sure why all of his reviews from 2009 are so bad, but I took him in Fall of 2015 and loved him! His lectures are long and very specific but I found him to be very willing to help me when I had any questions. I visited his office several times and he was very willing to help me with concepts I did not understand. I learned a lot from him!
                
                   His tests are super hard, and his lectures are a little long. But he is the professor who taught me the most about sociology (esp Marx) and about writing essays the right way for sociology. Definitely a must to take him if considering grad school. 
                
                   Complex Organization is this guy's specialty and although I was confused at first, he slowly but surely explained the material in a simplistic manner.  He was clear, responsive, and very organized.  I enjoyed his exams and paper options.  Others don't know what a scholar really is like until they meet Prechel.
                
                   I don't know what everyone else is talking about. You probably didn't understand the material or the professor but I felt that he was very open, clear, structured, organized, and very responsive to questions.  In my opinion, he is the epitome of the Germanic style of professor in the US that American students don't understand.  One of the best.
                
                   I LOVE this class. IDK why these people don't like him. Class well organized, very nice, if you get an answer wrong he is really cool about teaching the correct answer. Awesome Prof. I would take another class of his.
                
                   Now that the semester is over I must say that this man has some serious issues which unfortunately he brings with him to the classroom. Prechel is very unstable and unorganized; he often loses control of his emotions in the classroom which I find very boyish. Also, he talks down to students and puts down other professors when they are not around.
                
                   Prechel throws more temper tantrams inside and outside the class than my two year old son; I think we would all be better off if he would just go home and play in the sandbox.
                
                   Harland Prechel is the best sociology professor the world has ever known. If you don't believe me then just ask him and he will tell you the same.
                
                   Dr. Prechel is a horrible professor; there is a reason why almost every gaduate student and faculty member in the department has nothing positive to say about him. Few graduate students work with him because of his emotional instability and few faculty members in the department have anything to do with him. In short, he is someone to avoid!
                
                   This professor is the worst professors I have ever had. He is very rude, opinionated, contradictory, and frequently displays a lack of ability to admit when he is wrong about something. Also based on my observations of his behavior, he shows many signs of suffering from some kind of pyschological disorder which makes him difficult to deal with.
                
                   This man is extremely rude and talks down to students. He once became angry with those in my class for not participating in class discussions, which he blamed on our &quot;inability to read&quot;. However, he failed to realize that few participate because of his tendency to be rude to and belittle those who do.  Stay away from him.
                
                   I do not recommend this professor. His lectures are unorganized, his thoughts lack precision, he is very opinionated and lacks the ability to objectively present material, he is often rude to students and has even been known to burst into temper tantrums which often involves cursing at students and belittling them.
                
                   Dr. Poston is an amazing professor and a wonderful lecturer. You have to go to class because attendance is part of your grade. He gives several opportunities for extra credit as well. His tests are not easy and this class is not a blowoff, though. There are two tests and final, which can be very specific. An A is attainable if you work for it.
                
                   Dr. Poston is the most passionate professor I've had the pleasure to meet at TAMU. He made me genuinely interested in demography, a topic I knew little to nothing about before. Textbook reading is pretty necessary for the test but not the lectures. He always curves and he bumps up final grades 1/3 of a letter grade if you've missed none or 1 class.
                
                   If you're not planning on being a quantitative major then you most likely won't have enthusiasm going into his class.  Prof. Poston is really enthusiastic about his topics which get you interested in them as well.  He provides you with everything you need to pass his class.  Highly recommended...even for other courses
                
                   Very rude guy. Too much work for the class itself. 
                
                   I took him for Criminology online and it has been the hardest class I have ever taken because he makes it complicated for no reason. Makes the most simple tasks complicated and all he ever assigns is busy work. WOULD NEVER TAKE HIM AGAIN. 
                
                   Really clear about her expectations, only 2 exams and 2 papers make up your entire grade. She did one iClicker question per week just to make sure we came to class. She is an Aggie and is really young so she is very approachable and understanding! Don't really need to buy the books she assigns because she goes over everything the next class.
                
                   Best teacher ever! I've never had such a fun class and a clear understanding of everything. She really knows how to get the point by, does activities that makes you understand completely. Definitely take her course!!
                
                   It was an easy A.  I'm not sure about accuracy of everything taught, but she is really nice and the class will go off on fun tangents.
                
                   Juan is really nice and a funny guy. There were quite a few in class assignments (list your thoughts, list things that relate etc). His tests are the issue. They are SUPER SUPER specific, "In class what was the percentage of blah blah" you have to take good notes and study them to pass. Otherwise its a very chill class, I would take it over again.
                
                   I would definitely recommend Professor Salinas! Make sure to go to class and not miss any notes. Tests are exactly over the notes taken in class. Easy A
                
                   He is not too hard of a grader, and the assignments you do are not hard at all. The tests will have questions about stuff you went over in lecture, so go to class, but the tests are not that hard and juan is a funny guy!
                
                   I enjoyed Professor Salinas's class very much. He shows lots of interesting videos and class discussions are always interesting. However, sometimes class opinions get to be too long and it gets boring. His tests are pretty tough, but if you take notes and listen in class, you'll be fine. Overall, I'd take this professor again.
                
                   He makes class fun and allows he students to express their opinion about whatever it is he is talking about. There are quite a few articles he tells you to read, but you don't really have to read them, you just need to know the main idea. Tests aren't worded the best way, but if you study you could do well.
                
                   Best teacher I've had at A&M so far. He really knows what he's talking about and makes class so fun. His test are a bit tricky but if you go to class and take notes you should do fine. Be sure to do all the readings because they all show up on the tests later. TAKE THIS CLASS
                
                   This class is really fun, and you learn a lot. He shows plenty of videos in class that are all interesting. Don't be afraid to share your ideas or ask a question. He loves class participation, and it's fun to interact with other students in sociology. He is generous with extra credit, but you have to put in the work to do it. He's great overall.
                
                   Sakamoto is a good professor. He can get off on tangents sometimes, but otherwise, write down everything he says pertaining to the notes and you'll pass easily. His exams aren't bad at all. He gives extra credit for participation. Basically everything on the exams is straight from lecture, so don't skip class. He is extremely fun to listen to.
                
                   What an amazing professor. He is hilarious and makes the tests as simple as possible. All you have to do is show up and pay attention and you will get 105s on all of your exams (he has extra credit points at the end of each exam). I would definitely take his class over again. Also gives extra credit if you participate in class!
                
                   He is a very nice guy and seems to really care about his students.   He goes with the flow.    You should participate in class because he really likes his students to give their input.    His tests have extra credit on them if you need it.   I would take his class again given the chance. 
                
                   Sakamoto-sensei has got to be one of the best professors in the sociology department. I actually felt like going to class because his lectures were interesting, and he made me laugh every day. I literally regretted the times I was unable to attend. Tests are easy if you go to class and pay attention. Gives EC opportunities for those who need it!
                
                   I loved Dr. Sakamoto! Because he is a third-generation Japanese American, he does not have a Japanese accent. There were 2 homework assignments, 2 tests, and 1 final. All of these were VERY easy. You get extra credit for participation and going to class. He is hilarious and made the class very enjoyable. He is the best professor I have had at A&M!
                
                   This class was pretty easy.  As long as we came to class, he emailed us the lecture slides.  There wasn't too much reading.  The exams were directly from the notes.  He's a nice guy, and he is a good teacher.
                
                   He was a good teacher there was just a ton of reading to do.  The tests were moderately difficult.
                
                   Great guy! He just started so he still has a lot to learn about being a professor but he is trying really hard. He gave us extra credit and took attendance points. His tests were super easy as long as you studied the slides and watched the videos he gave (most of which are funny so they're easy to get through). Overall really nice!
                
                   I loved having him as my professor! He truly does care about his students and their well being. He goes out of his way to help. The class is lectures and debates, which make the class very interesting, even if your major isn't sociology. The tests and quizzes come straight from lecture and slides. Great professor overall! Highly recommended!
                
                   Great Professor classes are mainly lectures/ discussions he brings up interesting points
                
                   You will read LONG articles. Expect pop quizzes. He is a smart man and is very helpful. The articles at times get tough, so you have to be a good reader. You will be required to right a ten page research paper. Although this class was a little tough, I learned so much from it. If you are dedicated, you will get an A like I did.
                
                   Class is based on reading academic papers & coming into class to have full class discussions where we may share our thoughts &comments & will include his guidance to better understand articles. 1 test, 8-10 page research paper on a topic of race and/or ethnicity of your choice. He'll guide you through the paper. Class made me a better person.
                
                   She says that there is a lot of required reading, but really, it is not required at all since the answers she is looking for on tests/papers/pop quizzes (which she will tell you about in advance) are on her worksheets,which are amazing. I am a computer science major, so I don't really read or write much, and I'm getting an A with hardly any effort.
                
                   If you want your life to be filled only with reading, then take the course.  I dropped it because I didn't have time to read for my other classes.  Also, if you can't understand Japanese, I wouldn't take the class.
                
                   The class was fairly easy.  She talked about individual student performance on exams in front of the class which was a little inappropriate in my opinion.  There was a lot of reading.  She required us to write one reading response per week.  She's very intelligent, but she is hard to understand sometimes with her accent.
                
                   Required A LOT of readings. At least one reading paper per week. Although the course itself is fun, the readings and papers are just about to kill everyone...So, be awared of it...
                
                   Great prof. Gives study guides for tests, lectures are entertaining, really made me love sociology! Would definitely recommend. 
                
                   If you read the textbook, you will do very well on the tests. Before each test, he will tell you everything that is and isn't going to be on it. Great guy!
                
                   Test are  very hard. If you are anything but a sociology major this will probably be really hard for you.
                
                   As long as you read you'll have a great time in her lectures. She's really enthusiastic and not boring. She brings in guest speakers so you'll get more understanding. I learned so much from her. Definitely would take again. 
                
                   She was fun and very excited about what she teaches. I'd take another class from her! 
                
                   You have to be a serious student to pass his class. Not doing your work would get you an F.
                
                   Interesting topic but he failed to educate. He was disorganized, hard to understand and unclear. You had to badger him repeatedly to get clarification or questions answered. He'd give multiple due dates & assignments & then change them, making the schedule confusing. Assignments & tests weren't hard but the teaching made for a frustrating semester.
                
                   One of the best at A&M.  Highly recommend you take him.
                
                   I found Dr Woods to be a great teacher.   He is very kind and has a straightforward way of teaching.   I met with him several times during office hours and he helped me every time.   He cares about students that care about learning. 
                
                   Professor Woods is not evil! His syllabus was clear cut, his lectures, while sometimes running into each other, were clear as well. I will say, if you don't want to go to class, don't sign up for this class. If you don't want to stay on top of readings, don't sign up. This class takes consistent effort. On another note, there's only one paper.
                
                   Don't take his class, my only advice. I struggled throughout the whole semester and even went to office hours all the time. It barely helped, and the tests are pretty hard. Do not take him!
                
                   Passing Woods class depends mostly on all of the outside readings. You will not pass if you do not read and take notes over what you are reading. Attendance is mandatory, but I constantly fell asleep in class and seriously didn't miss much. The paper is easy to do if you ask the TA for clarification, and tests are confusing but passable.  
                
                   Top notch professor.   High expectations, but that's what I am paying for.  If your looking for an easy class, go elsewhere.  If you want to learn, take this class. 
                
                   Every rating on here is 100% accurate to the way Professor Woods conducts his class. I would not advise anyone to take a class with him. 
                
                   His lectures are long and scattered. He can't give you definite answers to your questions and does not explain why you are wrong, just says you are wrong. There is a lot of reading. The tests are ridiculously hard, even when going to class and reading. He was a complete jerk to me when I met with him one on one too. Would not recommend him.
                
                   This guy is an absolute jerk, at least in my experience. Went to him for help multiple times and he blew me off, canceled meetings and ignored my emails. In lecture he is not really clear at all and he talks very quietly so if you sit in the back chances are you won't hear him. He's boring, doesn't lecture clear info, and grades unnecessarily hard
                
                   There was way too much outside reading for a 3 hour course, his tests also cover such minute details, there is only one outside paper so I guess that was a plus. Don't expect him to curve the class at all, even if you just need a point 
                
                   I fell in love with sociology but not with him. He does not curve at all even though his class is way harder than neccessary. cannot believe i got a B after working so hard; cannot believe a class like this could have brought down my GPA. do not recommend. sociology is great but he is not. 
                
                   I worked very hard (didn't miss a single class, read every reading and textbook chapter, and extensively studied every term and concept possible) and made a B in this course (my only B, I'll add). Tests are confusing and did not seem to reflect the textbook or what he had been teaching us. He's nice but made sociology way harder than necessary.
                
                   As a professor, he sucked. The lectures are three times a week and many times seem to go over little information. Although, the lectures are interesting it gets to a point it feels like they are wasting your time. Tests are challenging because of his lack of teaching and preparation for them and mainly material from lecture (book is a supplement)
                
                   DO NOT TAKE. Lectures are scattered. Tests are hard. Grades the paper really hard. The lecture material is what most of the test is based off of, but you have to know the material much deeper than what he gives you. The book doesn't explain the lecture material well. And he doesn't put his lectures online. He's a nice guy, but it's not worth it.
                
                   Took attendance and sometimes gives participatory grades in class. YOU MUST READ THE TEXTBOOK & SUPPLEMENTAL MASSEY READINGS TO DO WELL ON THE EXAMS. There's one paper - many of my classmates got C's but I got an A+ so I guess it depends?  Doesn't always give straight answer if you ask for clarification. Lots of discussion  group work in class.
                
                   The only plus about this class was there's no homework but 3 exams w a final and short essays that were graded very harshly. WOULD NOT RECOMMEND. Oh, and you WILL NOT PASS IF YOU DO NOT READ.    
                
                   Dr. Woods is a nice guy but the class is a lot more challenging than expected. His lectures normally take the entire time and cover a lot of information. Participation is needed to do well and you have to attend class if you want to do well. The material isn't really hard but the test are kinda tricky and require studying if you want to do well. 
                
                   Hard and boring class. 
                
                   Dr. Woods is a great guy, but his class was pretty difficult. He is not clear on what is going to be on the exams and his lectures can be a bit scattered. The class was definitely a lot harder than it should have been. You MUST read in order to do well on the exams and the chapters are fairly long and kinda boring. 3 exams and 2 short papers.
                
                   Not a very hard subject, just a hard class because there are not very many grades. Grades papers harder than they should be graded. His TA's are not very helpful at all. Not very clear on what will be on the tests.  I would not recommend this class. 
                
                   Very nice and helpful!
                
                   I had a study abroad class with this professor that was phenomenal.  He offered a lot of information and he went out of his way to ensure that students were faring well.  He is very patient and will answer any questions.
                
                   Dr. Clinton was a wonderful teacher.  He is very caring and encouraging with all students.
                
                   I don't have enough good things to say about Dr Clinton! I had him for 3 or 4 classes over my career at TAMUC and he really is one of the best teachers I've had in my life.  My advice : READ THE BOOK and do the review sheets. AND LEARN THE SCHOOL MOTTO!  He tells you exactly what he wants you to know.
                
                   Great teacher, I had for for a British Studies program over the summer, and he made me almost want to transfer to this school. Nothing bad to say at all.Take his clas if you can.
                
                   Clinton is great.  He wants to see his students succeed and does what ever he can to help them.  He brings in a number of outside resources to help you better grasp the concept.
                
                   Rock is one of few professors who is interested in your success in the classroom, college, and life.  He holds students accountable for reading material and previously studied information.  I highly reccomend him as a professor and Sr. Seminar. READ THE BOOKS and consider taking the class whatever your major.  You'll learn important career skills.
                
                   Love him!
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Senior Seminar is kinda dull, but Rocky is too adorable calling us scholars. He connects with his students and is concerned with your overall performance in college, not only in his class. Very very nice guy, but will sometimes tell it like it is so be prepared.
                
                   this is a cool prof! Prof Clinton is the best! I also had the marriage class and I enjoyed both classes!
                
                   Awesome Prof!  But, be prepared to work.
                
                   Good proffessor just to many stories and once you have had him once you will hear the same stories over and over again.  Very knowledgeable and does form bonds with his students.
                
                   He is a great professor!  He forms good relationships with his students and does everything that he can to make sure that they do well in his classes.
                
                   know your stuff, read before class
                
                   No Comments
                
                   No Comments
                
                   No Comments
                
                   EXCELLENT TEACHER!!!!  He expects you to know your stuff though, so his tests tend to be thorough.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   I took him for 3 different classes, pulled of A's in 2 of them and a C in the other one but that was because I didn't study at all. He is a great guy and willing to help you succeed. He wants you to pass, but you never have homework, your grade is based on the average of all your tests throughout the year. Take notes and read a little bit!
                
                   i could have pulled out a A or even a B with a little more readin and studying! very cool professor and is willing to work with u as long as you try!
                
                   Funny, flexible, caring, interested.  A real student's teacher, wants you to succeed and will help you make that happen.
                
                   great teacher
                
                   awesome teacher helps you out whenever you need it
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Dr. Edwards is a funny man if you ask me. His sense of humor is very dry so if you're not use to that then you may want to so your feelings don't get hurt. If you at least try in his class you will be successful. Show no effort and you will fail.
                
                   Class was fine, fairly easy. Edwards doesnt have the best attitude and it does take some getting use to. He's assisted with passing grades in the past but if your attempting to graudate dont expect any assitance especially if your a point or two off. LOL. He's cool though, i guess.
                
                   He thinks because he is tenured that he can do & say whatever he wants. He does not care about the students, let alone what they think. All he does is say &quot;uh-huh&quot; all the time. He is a very rude man. As far as the course work, pretty easy but his attitude makes his classes not worth taking.
                
                   I took Dr. Edwards SOC 350 class online.  His tests require application...understandable.  However, he would throw in random questions that were never touch on in the textbook or in his additional notes.  He may be a great in class teacher, but I would not recommend taking his course online.
                
                   Dr. Edwards commands respect from his class but in a professional manner, he does not tolerate tardiness or talking out of turn in his class.  He loves students and the subject matter and he has taught me plenty.  Anyone that says otherwise is just ignorant.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   He is an obnoxious jerk.
                
                   You know, people may compain about him, but he's hilarious in class. This man is nuts! You'll do fine in his class, as long as you aren't late and remember to turn off your phone...
                
                   Hmmm, I will just say I'm so glad I'm done with that!
                
                   Dr. Edwards is way cool and straightforward. Tells it like it is and saves you the trouble of BS. Lays it out and takes no crap. No surprises. Wish he taught more soc classes.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Be ready to pop some neurons.  He has a lot of energy, and gets the job done.  I may have the sole distinction of being allowed to enter his class late.  He abhores tardiness, but once showed mercy when he saw that I was taking notes from the hallway.  He knows his stuff and is VERY ebullient.
                
                   tough,fair,clear,impatient with people who won't work.  Good teacher, good class
                
                   Great professor!! Animated and very clear in his expectations.  Fun class but you have to read and you betta be on time!!
                
                   Dr. Edwards tells it like it is. Follow his rules and instructions. Class is definitely not a blow off but grading is fair and he doesn't take any high school bs like some other teachers do.
                
                   Not easy, not hard...but very interesting and intense. He's a good professor. Don't ever be late and always do the assignments. I was scared of him at first, but you get used to him and his mischievous chuckle.
                
                   Dr.Edwards is a great professor with a lot of knowledge about his field. Dr. Edwards is a nice person as long as you are on time to class, and have the needed supplies for his class.  Dr. Edwards can be very helpful when you need him but goes quickly.
                
                   OH MY GAWD you idiot below-you have confused &quot;arrogant&quot; with professional. Looks like you shouldn't be in upperlevel classes, or even in college!
                
                   Course material is easy, but Willie is obnoxious and arrogant.  I would never recommend him to any student.
                
                   I really liked this class! She's super nice and really helpful.  It's an easy class and she'll help you out to.  Really funny at times and really patient.  Makes a boring subject kinda interesting.
                
                   Fun class, she tries to help students out as much as possible. It's an easy course and easy teacher.
                
                   Could not control class, only time this professor had authority was when she got another professor to talk to the students.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   This class is good class for capstone. Super nice man and brings in real world examples to class. Expects you to do the reading and study for tests. Good class and good professor.
                
                   she was a good teacher really made me think of things differently. yea it was a little unorganized but when you are getting 60 students involved all at the same time it will be that way. she is very smart and is not afraid to cover controversial topics. I would recomend her to other students
                
                   Easy class. Very disorganized, however. Never knew what my grade was because she doesn't assign that much and never passes anything back. For a class called Minority GroupS she only goes over one specific group pretty much. If you're looking for an easy class, this is it. Just don't expect organization or to learn anything you didn't already know.
                
                   Pro. K, really taught to where its relating to the issues that are going on in todays society. She makes it to where the whole class interacts with one another and everyone become a class rather than an individual. She really enjoys what she does and see to it that her students enjoy it also.... Thanks Prof. K
                
                   Very interesting class.  Lots of group work and discussion.  Class is very thought provoking.
                
                   Do the discussions and three exams. You will pass. Super easy. 
                
                   This class was super easy.  I took Marriage and Family to meet hour requirements.  He has you do two tests and two projects.  All discussions are worth extra credit.  The final was optional and was used only to replace a low test grade.  Easy A!!
                
                   &quot;I had Singh for a few classes when it was still ETSU. He was a geat lecturer, with accurate and valuable advice about how to succeed in the outside world. I went on to get a Ph.D largely due to his encouragement and example. Impecible character! I appreciate how he terrorized us into learning.&quot;Lol hahahaha
                
                   &quot;I too worked for Dr. Singh and found him to a fair man of high character and I never saw him be anything less than a gentlemen who really cares for the students.&quot;  lol lol ha ha ha ha
                
                   I took Dr. Singh online and his class was extremely easy as long as you buy the book. No papers or anything. Just weekly online quizzes and three tests. He drops like 4 of the lowest quiz grades and the lowest test grade. He really does everything he can to make sure you succeed and do well. Adds extra credit as much as he can.
                
                   I too worked for Dr. Singh and found him to a fair man of high character and I never saw him be anything less than a gentlemen who really cares for the students.
                
                   YOU HAVE GOT TO BE KIDDING!!!!!  You will need some serious medication to make it through this one!
                
                   I had Singh for a few classes when it was still ETSU.  He was a geat lecturer, with accurate and valuable advice about how to succeed in the outside world.  I went on to get a Ph.D largely due to his encouragement and example.  Impecible character! I appreciate how he terrorized us into learning.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Great teacher! Wonderful lectures and advice toward life!! VERY SUCCESSFUL MAN! Every teacher should follow his teaching skills.
                
                   ok professor........don't sit on the front row, unless you like getting sprayed
                
                   Dr. Singh was very understanding and very helpful with assignments;  he was very pro-student.
                
                   This teachers obsession with writing papers on sexual harassment is very uncomfortable to female students.
                
                   I used to work in the sociology dept when  I went to school there.  Singh is a disgusting man who thinks a woman's only purpose is to do a man's bidding.
                
                   Need to read book to pass this course. Can't go off PowerPoints and lectures. Also need to read the table can't skip them like usual. 
                
                   HE'S THE BEST. 
                
                   Thompson is a great professor! I enjoy learning from him, he has taught there for decades. BAD: he gets off topic and talks about sports and wastes my time and tuition. GOOD: covers tons of material from memory, explains very well, very funny and interesting professor.  test are pretty difficult though. 
                
                   Great teacher. Wrote the book, literally. Hes really fair on grading test.
                
                   If you come to class, and at least skim over the material, you can pass with flying colours. This professor is amazing, and helps the student pass, if you are willing to put in a bit of effort.
                
                   Makes class entertaining! Really is here to help the student.
                
                   great teacher
                
                   Man where do I start, i believe Dr. Thompson is one of the greatest teachers ive ever had you are guaranteed to learn in his class he wrote the book and he knows his stuff!! If you read and pay attention in class [and he keeps the class interesting his sarcarsm and stories are the best] you will have a good grade... I got a well deserved A!
                
                   He wrote the textbook, so read it! He also doesn't cover very much of the information you need to know for the the tests in class, so  read   the   book. Nice guy, but I think his teaching approach could use some more structure.
                
                   Absolutely best class ever. Knows his stuff!
                
                   I don't have enough good things to say about Dr. Thompson! The class was easy if you just make sure to follow in the book. He focuses on vocabulary and short responses on tests. I found the class entertaining and my mind never wandered.
                
                   Very fun class to go to.
                
                   Sociology was my major befor taking his class, but once i took it he made me not really want to take it anymore so i changed my major.  All he does is lecture and give test over things he expects for us to read weather he goes over it or not.  He is not the type of teacher i would PREFER ANYONE TO GET , so if you see you are going to get him change
                
                   Dr. Thompson is a good professor. He has a good attitude and always makes class interesting. I would recomand him and this class to others.
                
                   Extremely passionate about his job... strives to make the student succeed.
                
                   He is a very good teacher and I enjoyed being in his class. He is also a great head of the Mayo College and I enjoy being a member of the Mayo Council. Thanks for a great year Dr. T!
                
                   I had Dr. Thompson for several classes as an undergraduate when it was still ETSU.  Definitely narcissistic, but not a bad lecturer.  I went on to get a Ph.D years later, at a much better school, and was pleasantly surprised to find that I had retained much of what I had learned in his courses.
                
                   Interesting class if you can stay awake.
                
                   I'm a doctoral level student and this was the best class and best professor I've EVER had.
                
                   I enjoyed every class I took from Dr. Thompson, and retained much of the information presented.  He managed to entertain AND deliver quality instruction.
                
                   This class has a lot of difficult material.  However, I found it quite easy, but I had taken a course like it before.  He has 3 tests, 2 short writing assignments, and 1 article review.  You will only use the book to study for the test and do the short writing assignments. Very vague study guides.
                
                   Took this course online. Less homework than my other online classes. Great Professor provided interesting material for us to study. If you need this course, take this prof!!
                
                   If you do not come to class you will fail. If you don't read, you will fail. She does NOT offer any extra credit unless you get lucky to fall on a semester where you can vote. We did do a mock trial and it was surprisingly fun, but does require time outside of class with your group. She gets very off topic during class and hardly ever teaches. 
                
                   Professor was constantly late to class, babied the students as though they were in high school (required to raise hands and be called on), always got off topic in lecture, always easily distracted, & incapable of following her own class schedule. Avoid taking her if you can, she is terrible at the teaching profession.
                
                   Very abrupt and not very pleasant to deal with.  All communications was through email.  Sent and email to class via LEO Mail that not all students check thus increased an already heavy workload. Does not return graded papers, test or quizzes for evaluation.  Avoid if at all possible. No real life experience, if you cant do then teach!
                
                   I had her for CJ 101, she was a bit strict, and you earned the grade you worked for. She requires that you read EVERYTHING, no power points  / little writing, mostly lectures. She has a 5 page paper you have to write, and her tests were timed online.. Moderate class, if you did the reading, hard if you slack off.
                
                   I had her online, the class was good I thought there was a lot of reading of articles, but what's new.  If I had a question I sent her an email or called and she helped me out. I enjoyed the challenge of her class and learned alot.I've taken 2 of her classes and will retake her again-learn something
                
                   dont not take her. she is the rude and unorganized and does not care if you fail. avoid her if all possible.
                
                   This teacher is very hard and not clear to understand. She is very rude and not that willing to help you when you are in need!!AVIOD IF POSSIBLE
                
                   Avoid if you can!  I took this class online.  She was not available except through email - and she doesn't understand what you are trying to ask so nothing gets answered. She just copies and pastes what is in the syllabus.  She moved up all of her test dates with less than a weeks notice. A lot of readings each week.
                
                   If you can avoid this teacher do so!! she is the worst teacher that i have ever had. She changes the syllabus up as she goes and likes to move up assignments. oh and it is your fault if you didn't turn it in on time. She says she doesn't accept excuses yet she likes to make them all the time. She is hypocritical!
                
                   Professor Meyer was a great teacher. She is so sweet and her class is easy to pass if you even put forth minimal effort. Definitely attend class because she gives random assignments worth 10 points. Had I not skipped two of those assignments I would have made an A!
                
                   She is an awesome teacher and very passionate about her work. If you pay attention and stay on track, you will pass with an A. She is more than willing to help her students and provides the tests to use as a review for the final. Recommend taking her again if given the chance. 
                
                   Her lectures are amazing, you'll never get bored. She is really interested in her students. She is really fun and nice!! For the exams you can take all the info from the book. She knows a lot about sociology, her classes are so interesting!  
                
                   He's a pretty good guy. His lectures are quite interesting, but you don't really have to take notes because he loads everything onto his website. The tests are somewhat difficult but you shouldn't have too much trouble passing this class as long as you study the notes, look over the quiz answers, and pay attention when reading the books.
                
                   He is a professor that talks a lot, but the lectures are pretty interesting.  The study guides helped on the tests.  But there are not that many grades other than the tests, so you have to do good on them.
                
                   OH My, where do I start. The text book is the most horrible thing i have ever read.  Purdy is funny and ok to listen to. But be prepared!!! the test reviews reflect nothing of what the test is like!!! The test is so confusing and NOT AT ALL straight forward!
                
                   Very bad teacher who likes to give long useless speeches in a monotone voice! Very bad and hard to understand/grasp this course.
                
                   am a soc major tok him for criminology- straight up straight forward no b.s teacher- go to class do study guides dont bs and he wont bs you - if you dont make an a or a b in his class its your fault
                
                   dr. purdy is a great teacher, he really knows his stuff, but he keeps his room at like -10 degrees also, his reviews help ALOT with the tests, basically he adds a couple questions but mostly rewords the questions, his tests are 30 multiple choice and 3 essay but you only pick 2 to write about. He is a good speaker and i would reccomend taking him!!
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Dr. Purdy is an awesome professor. He's very clear with what he's saying and that helps me understand what he wants from us. His study guides help, too
                
                   Dr. Purdy is very good at getting the point across. I have some classes where the prof takes forever to get to the point of the lecture. His study guides help, too.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   This class was not very hard... It did require a bit of reading...The notes were not bad... overall, I enjoyed this class very much.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   No Comments
                
                   shes awesome. she likes to give personal examples which is more visual. she does most of her testswork through blackboard, which is nice because you get your grade right after you take the test. will be taking her again 
                
                   Seems like a very nice lady. Had some issues with our class with disorganization and such, and really hated the group project but over all it was a easy class.
                
                   As stated before, she makes assignments crystal clear, she does mostly take home tests. She doesn't tolerate collaboration on tests. She is fun and encourages student participation. You will learn from her and it will be fun in the process.
                
                   She is an easy professor, but don't think you won't learn anything. If you pay attention, you can learn a lot about practical information and facts about our society. Hardly any homework, no group work, and tests are open book take home tests. Likes to tell personal stories that tie into the lesson.
                
                   Awesome Teacher...
                
                   Awsome teacher. Fun to be in class with and talks about real things.  Goes though the chapters in class so no real reading out of class.  Plus the book is really commen sense.  Just show up and be attentive
                
                   awesome class and teahcer.  too easy just go to class on time.
                
                   SOOOOOOO EASY!
                
                   easy and fun!
                
                   As Dr. Kwon is foreign, she is not difficult to understand. During the course, we only had 8 quizzes and all homework is done in class while she walks around and gives any help that is needed. She also said that she has simplified the course to make it a little easier to understand. Super easy, just show up, pay attention, and do the assignment.
                
                   Dr. Pearce-Morris is a great professor, and she made the class very interesting and entertaining.  This class was a required elective and at first I did not think that I would be interested in the subject or material, but having a good professor makes all the difference.  I really enjoyed the semester and really learned  some good information.  
                
                   Look, She's one of the cutest TAMUk has to offer. Off of that strength alone I will take the class again. Other than that she really is great at what she does. Caring, kind heart, and very patient. So approachable. Plus she's from NY! Best thing cooking for TAMUK right now.
                
                   Awesome professor, very chill, very helpful, caring, and nice. Her lectures for this specific class were based on powerpoints and she makes great use of it. She lectures step by step and in a very clear and concise way. I'd recommend her to anyone. She's also attractive if that helps make up your mind!
                
                   Very good professor and super nice
                
                   Great professor! Had him early in the morning, very interesting and easy class. 
                
                   easy, common sense
                
                   He's great and I wish he would teach other courses because he's extremely helpful! Take him early in the morning you'll find out why!
                
                   I took human sexuality with him. He is such a great professor. He does a lot of group work. He gives out the reviews which are usually the same as the test. The final exam is online and can use notes books friends. Very easy class and interesting. Make sure you take him!
                
                   I am taking him for a psychology class right now, and he is a really nice professor. Very helpful, and knows his material. Helps you review for the tests, and gives you study guides so it would help you study.
                
                   Reviews prior to tests. Pretty fun and easy class. Tests are fairly easy, but go to class. It's enjoyable.
                
                   He talks a lot but he gives really good notes and give reviews for test. Over all this class is an easy A
                
                   I cannot say what I would like to on this site anymore bc there isn't any real freedom of speech here, so I will just say there are many men & women who call themselves professors but have no passion in teaching and do no care about those who pay to learn. This is one of those situations. Some are power hungry & want to be respected for a title-Dr
                
                   Completely unorganized class. Professor rarely addressed the students about the class. It was online but interaction is something one would expect from a professor, especially when there were problems with getting papers graded and information out to the students.
                
                   Great Online class!
                
                   Dr. Beckley is a great professor very easy going very passionate about his field of work. His online classes are great! I learned alot from him. There is quite a bit of reading but it is well worth it. I have taken two of his courses and they were both great. Classes were both very very easy as well as easy to understand! Great professor!!!
                
                   Great professor overall. Super easy grader as long as you hand in the work on time and follow the rubric. Lots of readings and group work, but it's all super easy! She's spunky and makes the class interesting. Shows alot of videos on the topic of racism in society. Most of the class is based on the oppression of African Americans. 
                
                   I dont recommend Her. Yes Shes tough she knows Her Stuff , she has great energy but Shes very insensitive. Shes pressuring, descriminates and has Her pick of favorites. Some click with Her some dont. It depends. Im glad i passed and i dont have to be there agin.
                
                   1 8pg paper 1 20pg journal 1 test you mess up once your screwed. her use of media was confusing and overwhelming. Power points, online manual, text book, reading assignments. I did more reading and writing in this class than all my English classes combined. Class environment was boring and frustrating. Would never take again. A very nice person tho
                
                   You want a College course you got it with this one. She is super nice. I will agree with both the negative and positive points other students have brought up. My own points are confusing, unclear with answers (that might be her teaching strategy). She definitely makes you think for yourself. The course is broad and I'm happy it's over.  
                
                   I thought Professor Chambers was an incredible teacher.  She teaches Sociological concepts and makes you think for yourself.  The negative reviews are about her not being clear and not being "helpful".  She teaches on a conceptual level, which means you need to participate.  The book is the basics and the assignments are applying it.  She is tough.
                
                   Fair warning AVOID this professor.  As said before she often goes off topic during class discussions and talks more about personal life than class work.  If you attempt to ask for clarification or assistance on HW she makes you feel like your an idiot for having asked.  Half the time she doesn't know who you are and doesn't care to know.
                
                   Nice lady, very confusing and unclear assignments
                
                   The semester started off okay then it went downhill from there. Let me say SHE'S TERRIBLE! She isn't clear whatsoever on her hw assignments, the journals are ridiculous. She's crazy, she thinks she's Spider Man. If you ask for her to clarify the hw she'll go psycho on you and make you regret asking. She's not approachable. Overall terrible teacher.
                
                   This course is very eye opening. There are few big projects but they are fairly easy if you put the effort in. She loves people who participate in her class. Attendance is a must. The book is needed for class but you do need to keep up with the readings. She's a great professor. If you like to talk and learn the beautiful and ugly T.Chambers!!!!!!
                
                   I would not recommend this teacher to anyone. She never goes over any of the material you need to know for class, she rambles on with stories about herself. Two quizzes make up 25% of your grade, a journal she makes you do is 50% and your final paper and test make up the other 25% You might as well just study sociology on your own, she's no help.
                
                   Very unorganized teacher. I would not recommend taking the class with her. I always did my work and was always in class and still did poorly. She isn't helpful and never stays on topic. I really wish I had a different professor and now I will have to take the class over again.
                
                   Class is relatively easy if you read the textbook, but lectures make little sense and professor rarely stays on topic.
                
                   Talks off topic all the time. Has a pet-peeve with homework, she doesn't collect it but gets supper annoyed if you don't give proof. Very confusing professor. Take caution.
                
                   Great professor! Gives alot of assignments and will take time to help you during her office hours. Attend class, take notes and hand in work on time and you will be fine.
                
                   if you listen, study, do your homework and PARTICIPATE and you will do great. theres no favouritism in her classes. she loves people speaking out with opinions, questions and any other thoughts and she will do the same. her teaching style is great and anyone ive spoke to who says otherwise were always the ones who didnt give the class their 100%
                
                   Even though I got a B, I would not take her again. She discusses her personal life too much, flirts with students, makes comments about them & has favorites. It's an easy class that's taught from the book. If you attend, participate and study you will do fine. Seriously consider whether her attitude is worth the easy grade before you take her.
                
                   Would advise against this class, UNLESS--you can gain access to her inner circle, she has favorites, and you will know if you are one of them the first few classes. If you are not, I suggest you drop the class, because you will have a hard time succeeding.
                
                   This teacher sucks I wouldn't take a class from her if it was free. She spends most of the time talking about her self and boyfriend she had at Saint Rose College. She has her favorites which is crazy and she lets you know it. When you ask a question she always has a smart remark along with it. she sucks I would never take her class again
                
                   I took Sociology in the Fall and I absolutely loved this teacher.  YOU absolutely have to forth effort.  She knows who works HARD and who doesn't.  The tests weren't hard as long as the homework was done. She laughs and jokes a lot which is refreshing.  WONDERFUL WOMAN. I will take another one of her classes for sure!!!!
                
                   There is nothing wrong with chambers what so ever.. She's fair, and kind. If you fail her class, it's YOUR own fault, not hers. as long as you do your work, and she sees your trying, she won't fail you. But like all other professors, you have to earn your grade, she doesn't give it to you.
                
                   Great prof! The main thing I didn't like was that the review for the final had 5 pages of cumulative work, and only 1 for recent material. But on the exam, he only gave about 9 cumulative questions, and about 66 were things we didn't really cover. So the final exam review did not help prepare you for the final as far as what you should focus on.
                
                   This professor is amazing! He is very articulate & uses stories & mental visuals to help you understand the concepts & theories behind social theory. Considering that this is not an easy subject, I believe that he couldnt do a better job at explaining it. Tests only covered what was discussed in class & the textbooks.He should teach more classes!
                
                   Took her for the second time last semester. Her online course is tough. 3-5 pg paper every week and 150 question mid-term/final. If you follow instruction and actually READ, you'll do fine!
                
                   Course was interesting and relevant to coping in everyday life. Assignments designed to help you study if you  do what is asked. Teacher strict about APA format and plagiarism. I learned a lot. Must read text. Online tests are timed. Must know material. No  time to to look up answers. She is a great teacher & lecturer  (in person classes)
                
                   yes, she helps you but you need to but the effort. She reads of the PowerPoint. She expects you to know the information already. I though the teachers where supposed to do that not you. She's is a tough grader. Some people are slow learners but she does not get that.
                
                   Professor Loalada inspires you to  want to learn. She is a great lecturer, and clearly loves her job. But be ready to work- -You truly earn the grade you get. I learned so much from her, and would definitely take another of her classes.  Must read book and attend classes to get best shot an an "A".  One of the best teachers I've ever had.
                
                   If your looking for an easy A, stay away! She is tough but the knowledge you gain is worth it! No exam reviews, but gives lots of "hints" during her lectures.  She really is a great professor and LOVES what she does! if you are willing to work and want to learn, I HIGHLY recommend her! 
                
                   If your goal is an easy  "A" don't attempt this.  Must read text and not skip class. Be prepared to work hard, and if you do, she will bend over backward to help you. I learned more than I ever expected. Even though it was a 3 hr. per day Maymester class, I was never bored. One of the best teachers I've ever had. Knows her stuff!!
                
                   Took her for personality. you can tell she loves what she does. I was never bored during her lectures and I took her for an 8:00 am class, she is really there for her students and would help you figure out what you need to do in order to pass the class. test are HARD! read the book and take good notes. if you're stuck let her know! 
                
                   Stephanie Loalada gives amazing lectures you will never be bored in her class that's for sure but she is a tough grader. She gives 3 papers and 3 tests total for the class and also a presentation. She integrates a little extra credit at the end of the semester. Overall she is a good professor but you MUST read the book because she is a TOUGH grader
                
                   Very helpful and caring teacher. Very tough work but as long as you keep up and ask questions you will be fine. She encourages participation and it definitely helps your grade. Very grown up class similar to grad school and it is important to read and for exams study glossary of chapters as well. Great experience!
                
                   If you're a Psyc major I would definitely recommend her. If not, I'd probably consider another professor unless you really want to learn and are willing to work hard. Expect to read the book, her lectures are fantastic, she offers a lot of extra credit, and she's very personable and understanding. Doing well in her class means knowing your stuff. 
                
                   Not helpful at all.  Expects you to know everything, or find out on your own.  No test reviews.  No make-up exams.  Takes too long to respond to emails which is critical in an online course.
                
                   If want a great experience she is the prof. to take. Her lectures are great! Her power points are great and she drops lots of hits during lecture on what will be on the exams. The exams are not easy but not hard if you study. If your lazy and do not expect to read the book take another class. She was life changing for me. I would take her again!
                
                   Professor Loalada is one of my favorites. If you do not like to be challenged then DO NOT take her courses. I think she is very interested for her students to learn. She explains everything very well, and if you get involved, study, you will  do great.
                
                   I will NEVER EVER take on of her classes!! One good thing I do have to say about proffesor Loalada is that she is a great speeker, but her test are horrible. You need to know the book inside out because she would not give you a study guide for the quizes. I have never been so stressed out about a class as I have been with this one. STAY AWAY!!!
                
                   Brings work experience to her teachings, one can relate to the subject taught.  Ms Molina is one of the best instructors @ tamu-sa.  She cares and is very helpful.  I would take another class with Ms Molina.
                
                   Ms. Molina is an amazing instructor.  Took Juv. Delinq. Quiz every week and discussion boards. mid-term & Final based off of the quizzes.  Study those and you have an A. 1 Paper not too hard. I will take her again! She makes class interesting she relates topics to real world settings.
                
                   She is great! Test are literally the same from blackboard, so take'em & print them and use them as your review for the mid term & final! Also there's a discussion every week & you must comment on two of your classmates, lastly there is one research paper! Super easy class & she's really cool, would def take her again!
                
                   funny guy makes learning crim a breeze
                
                   I won't say he is easy, I will say that he has high expections for his students.  He certainly makes you think for yourself and challenges his students to not sterotype or be so judgemental.  I enjoy his lectures on theories.  If you want to learn and be exposed to a world of Sociology then Dr. McGinnis is the professor to take.
                
                   Great Professor, Great class discussions, but tests & papers a little hard but well worth effort.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Professor McGinnis has alot of knowledge. Very intelligent. Tests can be difficult. If you dont know the answer he will not make you feel dumb.
                
                   he really tries to relate course material to the real world. sometimes he uses a lot of jargon which makes him a little hard to follow but he has no problem clarifying when asked. essay tests are unbelievably difficult but if you seem to grasp the material otherwise it's not that big of a deal.
                
                   Physiological Psychology, best class I ever took that I did not want to take. He is a fantastic lecture, goes above and beyond (IE, bought sheep brains out of his on pocket just so students could learn better) Always had class activities and was motivational. This material is challenging ( BrainPsychology) He's Defiantly worth it.
                
                   By far the BEST PROFESSOR I have experienced in my college years. This professor is absolutely amazing! Keeps his students engaged, structured, and eager to learn more.... Enthusiastic, caring, and goes above and beyond the call of duty. I don't see him on the roster for Spring of 2015. Maybe I'll go to UTSA instead.
                
                   Dr. Previc is the most enthusiastic professor I have ever taken.  If you take him, which I highly recommend, you will see the sincerity he has toward his students.  He really involves everyone to learn and makes the class fun.  Probably the sweetest professor I have had.  Loved, loved, loved his class.  I took him for Biopsychology.
                
                   This professor is awesome!  I would absolutely take another class taught by him.  He's very interested in the material and enthusiastic - take this class if you get a chance!!!!  I always knew where I stood in the class.
                
                   great professor. class very hard but he takes an interest in making sure you pass. YOU WILL LEARN!!! I highly recommend him.
                
                   This class over all is one of my favorite courses by far. The content that this class offers is not easy because there is too much to learn, but Dr. Previc is very passionate and knows what he is talking about. I enjoyed this class very very much. GREAT GREAT PROFESSOR!
                
                   great prof, interested in the student and goes beyond to see that all pass his courses.
                
                   Funny prof. He kinda treats the class like little kids. You get tons of extra credit opportunities. Exams are kinda easy, and he makes sure to emphasize what will be on the exams.
                
                   He makes his class interesting and truly cares about his students. Most people say he's easy but I found this class the most challenging and interesting of all my classes for some reason...and I'm a full time student!
                
                   Great Professor! I enjoyed his class. Study his power point and read the text and you will get an A, Overall he has great teaching techniques and very fun. Attendance Mandatory to get extra points The tests are not tricky. I would take him all over again. The BEST Prof. I've had here at A&M
                
                   Great Professor. I really enjoyed his class. You do have to study his power point and read the text to get an A, but overall, he has great teaching techniques and tests are not too tricky if you pay attention. I would take him again. He really should be teaching more classes at A&M!
                
                   ALL AROUND GOOD PROFESSOR ! Inspires and motivates his students to do well in his class. Really loves to teach and is passionate about his subject. Great sense of humor with young and older students. Highly recommended.
                
                   ONE OF MY FAV. PROF.EVER! he knows his stuff & is very helpful. i've taken him for 2 courses & i would certainly take him again! Takes attendance, but he gives extra credit for prefect/good attendance!
                
                   Favorite Professor! Knows his stuff and knows to teach all kinds of students, old and young.
                
                   Dr. Previc is a GREAT prof. you can really tell that he loves what he does. If you attend class tests will be easy. Final is comprehensive over the past exams. one paper & presentation.
                
                   Dr. Previc is a great teacher. He?s enthusiastic and very animated. Uses many teaching styles. He tries to help in any way he can. Tries to really prepare you for test, and gives you lots of notes to study. Does extra credit if you need it. He loves what he teaches; brings a lot to the table. You?ll learn a lot.
                
                   The BEST professor at A&M. I was worried about taking stats but he made it understandable. If you have a question, or aren't sure about how to do something he will take the time to help you understand it. Yes statistics is a hard subject, but if you show up for class and do your homework you will do fine. Take his class, you won't regret it!
                
                   Best teacher to take statistics with, he's really nice, takes time after class to answer any questions, answers emails, and makes the material really easy to understand.
                
                   He did not allow open book or notes, but he taught Stats so well (and took the time to answer questions and re-word explanations if we did not understand something), so in the end, we did not need an open book exam! Awesome professor, I hope he keeps teaching here!
                
                   Very laid back, gives practice quiz's for exams. No one should have trouble passing this course (C or above). He lets the students lead the class most of the times, so there's a lot of talking.
                
                   Take him! I had no issues understanding his discussions, PPTs, or exams. He talks slow enough to give you time to digest what he is saying, & keeps it interesting. He is also kind & considerate, & will not humiliate you if you give out the wrong answer (as I did many times). Gives a review & exams are in line with class discussions, PPTs & text.
                
                   Great teacher. He is very helpful. Doesnt over complicate stuff. If you don't get it he slows down and helps you understand. Lots of stuff to cover in Research methods but he helps you want to learn. Nothing like Coulton or Bohmann.
                
                   Very helpful and understanding. You will have to do the work if you want a good grade, but she is available for any questions and gives clear and precise instructions. You must read the material or you will not be able to do the homework.
                
                   absolutely the best Sociology Professor I've had so far! Gives feedback quick and easy to understand! Grades fairly and gives you the chance to ask for help before submitting an assignment.
                
                   I liked Dr. Turley because he's one of the few professors that aren't scared to be opinionated. And for a class like Deviance that is a necessity! He was controversial at times and a little unorganized with assignments and due dates, but the content and knowledge I got from his lectures was something that I will keep with me forever. 
                
                   Prof. Turley is an awesome professor. He gave 4 writing assignments all no more than 3 pages req. in length and then there was an 8 page research paper OR 16 volunteer hours at an organization that is pre-approved by him. He is straight to the point and lectures may cause conflict but keep you interested. He is the best prof. I've had yet.
                
                   This class was a lot more in depth than I expected. There is 1 opportunity for extra credit, which is well worth the read. The instructor is not overly helpful. He also changed the grading point scale at the last moment. Some of the timed quizzes are quite difficult. Unless you are a sadist, pick another instructor.
                
                   Quizzes cover material from the books&lecture.He typed out his lectures and listed all the things to look for while you read.Pay attention to that material&read all the chapters then quizzes are cake.he offered 2 times to do extra credit,DO IT!Term paper sucked but it's do-able.Helpful everytime I contacted him with legitimate questions.
                
                   There is not a lot of opportunity to keep your grade high. There are only a few timed quizzes and the answers come from two books, no study guide and little help from him. Couple of students sent mass emails to the class crying out for help after being turned away.Told me he has other classes to worry about and can't respond to every student.
                
                   Not a helpful person at at all. Don't ask him to explain someting, it just makes it a thousend times worse.
                
                   She is absolutely amazing. I did not know what to expect but she made the class very interesting and fun. There are 4 papers and 2 tests but she helps you out with all of them if you go to her. You do have to read all of the books. She is not afraid to give her opinion and make fun of you if she does not like your opinion. 10/10 would take again.
                
                   Her being hot is only a plus but she is an amazing professor.
                
                   Betty is THE BEST professor I have ever had. She is super young which makes her ability to relate the material to everyday life easier. I LOVED going to class because she kept the lectures short and very interesting. You do have to read a few books but they tend to be pretty interesting and you HAVE to go to class due to pop quizzes (they're easy)!
                
                   I enjoyed her class, she's funny and relatable. GO TO HER OFFICE HOURS, I made 100s on all of my essays because I did. She reviews before tests, so they're not hard. She gives 16 pop quizzes on the readings, so make sure you do those. Also, she gives 5 bonus points for attendance - I highly recommend taking advantage of those.
                
                   I worked harder in this class than I ever have in a class and I got an 87. Tests are mostly multiple choice and it's easy to be stuck with two choices and pick the wrong one. Miss no more than 3 classes and get 5 bonus points on the final but they really didn't make a difference for me. But you have to go to class anyway if you want to learn
                
                   There are 16 pop quizzes over the 6 books and several lengthy readings done over the entire semester. so, READ!! Essays are an easy A if you go to her office hours and have her look over it before it is due. Their are 2 exams (midterm and final), 4 essays, 16 pop quizzes. If you attend every class for the semester(she does role sheets)5+ on final.
                
                   Professor Marquez is amazing, my favorite this semester. She makes herself avaliable all semester to make sure you understand all the material and what she is looking for in her assignments. She's hilarious and it is impossible to be bored in class. Just read and utilize office hours and it'll go great.
                
                   She is incredible. She is my favorite professor this semester. She is absolutely hilarious and genuinely cares how you do in her class. She applies everything to everyday things. She promotes class discussion, so you have to read. You will do great as long as you do the readings and show up to class!
                
                   Professor Marquez is such a great human. There is a buttload of reading, but her lectures definitely make up for it. She is young, funny, and definitely knows what she is talking about. I strongly recommend taking her because you will come out with much more knowledge than you had going in. Thank you and Gig them.
                
                   I loved her class so much I decided to minor in Sociology
                
                   I loved Prof Aldana and I loved this class. It's not "easy" but definitely not difficult if you do the reading (that's super interesting anyway) and just come to class. She wants you to do well and always makes herself available too, which is really neat. Take her! 
                
                   Professor Marquez's class was one of the most interesting ones that I've taken in my 2 years at A&M. She curses quite a bit, but that and her jokes actually help to make the material more memorable, and she's always available to help if you need it. If you read and actually try on the papers you'll do fine in this class. Definitely would recommend.
                
                   Professor Aldana is great! She's a graduate student, so she's pretty young, and I found that this made her much more interesting. She cusses a lot, so if you're really offended by that I wouldn't recommend taking her. Pretty much as long as you pay attention and at least skim the reading, you'll do fine. Also, actually try on the three papers!
                
                   Love her. She was super interesting. It was never boring.
                
                   Literally the best professor on campus. 
                
                   Absolutely amazing class with an even better professor. I took her class on suggestion and decided to become a sociology major because of it. I've suggested it to everyone I know, and I've taken even more classes with her. One of my favorite professors at the university.
                
                   The main thing with Dr. VR is to be engaged, get involved in class discussion, and use critical thinking. As long as what you argue in papers and short answer is well supported, you will do fine. This is the best class I have ever taken, and I would love to retake it if I could for credit. I wish she taught all of my classes.
                
                   You had better read;be interested;and be ready to use critical thinking skills.Dr. VR really cares about her students and I would recommend her for any SOC class.I wished that I could have taken Deviant Behavior with her.She will make the class interesting even with boring material and subject matter.Would be great advisor for grad students.  A+!!
                
                   I just finished my junior year in college and I have had Dr. VR for 6 courses. By FAR the best professor on this campus. Be prepared to read articles, write papers, and engage in class. You will actually learn and remember rather than regurgitate just for a test. She is one of the few faculty who truly care about her students. LOVE HER!
                
                   I took VR spring 2013, at first the i was interested but then my interest declined after the 5th week. VR is always over the top with her dirty comments and lively "teaching" antics. She is very biased! I honestly think she could talk about something other than bug chasing, tea cup rooms& DL men. If you don't agree w her she will deduct pts
                
                   I loved her! She clearly knows what she is talking about, and makes learning about it fun as well. Easy A if you show up, read, and take notes.
                
                   Dr. Villanueva-Russell is a great professor.  I enjoyed her classes a lot and she challenges you to think. She knows her subject matter and likes her students to be successful.  If you do not do well in her class it is because you don't want to!  I can not wait to take her again.
                
                   Enjoyed the class, learned a lot, Sociology is not my thing but she helped me to understand.  Highly recommend her class!!!  She is a riot!
                
                   BEST PROFESSOR EVER!!!!!!!!!! funny, interesting, fair, appropriate level of difficulty. she is amazing.  i wish she taught ever class i need to take.
                
                   Dr. VR, although a bit wacky at times, does a fine job with her lectures. She knows what she teaches and definitely keeps the class interesting. The only way to fail her class is to not pay attention.  You earn your grade in her class.
                
                   All I gotta say is--4 MORE WEEKS!! This was the worst class Ive had at this school, and that is saying something. It will be yours too.  Easy A but I wished I learned something.
                
                   GIMME A BREAK! I took this as an elective because I was told that the course would be useful for my major but this was the worst class I've had so far at this college.  The woman is hung up on herself and doesn't know what she's talking about.  Maybe if she actually READ an Intro to Soc textbook she could teach us something.
                
                   What a total waste of time and $$$--the semester was an episode of PeeWee's Playhouse.  I switched my major to CJ to avoid having to take this woman again.
                
                   Are you kidding!! I think it's great to have a breath of fresh air! She IS funny and knows what she's talking about. I loved her class--are you complaining about NOT needing your book&#63;&#63; This was an easy class, however, I learned many things about deviant behavior. You try talking about anal sex in front of 30 college students.
                
                   great and funny
                
                   This girl will get on your nerve because she treats students like we are in kindergarten. Lame attempt at humor. You will definitely laugh AT her but not funny and you will get absolutely nothing out of this class.
                
                   If you are not into soc and the looking at things beyond face value, then you won't get the point of the class.  But she is wonderful prof.  She keeps you entertained and if you don't pass it is your own fault.  You can pass the class without reading the material but to get the point in it you must read.
                
                   GLAD THAT ONE'S OVER--was that a COLLEGE class&#63;&#63;&#63; Totally useless course, the material is outdated, and she lies when you ask a question and she doesn't know the answer. AVOID!!!
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Excellent class, I highly recommend taht it be required for everyone and every degree program. Prof. White is very good about back-n-forth communication and making certain that you acheive your goals.
                
                   Dr White I very helpful I did enjoy his class he was clear and gives helpful notes I highly recommend his class to anyone.
                
                   I enjoyed the class and videos provided on inequality.  The material was interesting and made you really think and see that we still have a long way to go with respecting other races. I thought Mr. White syllabus was easy to follow, he had all the assignment well laid out, all we had to do was read, follow the instructions, and do the assignments.
                
                   Dr. White is a very helpful and understanding professor. He encourages us to be open and honest about a very touchy topic in America. I would absolutely encourage others to take his class. There is a lot of writing and requires use of your critical thinking skills.
                
                   I have to say that Dr. White's Race and Ethnic Relations class was both insightful and fun! He provided an environment that encouraged students to be honest and to grow and learn. I recommend this class to anyone and feel it should a requirement!
                
                   Great instructor! Professor White ALWAYS responded to questions within a timely manner and the instructions were clear. My written assignments received low scores in the beginning but he worked with me and I received nothing but A's after that. Very helpful. Take his class!
                
                   Dr. White's teaching method challenged me to not just participate in class, but to really delve into the subject and give it more than 100%. Every assignment he gave had a relative meaning to it and related to life. He provides quick feedback so you know if you are on track. He is there if you need help and genuinely want you to succeed.
                
                   Had Dr. White for 2 courses & he is amazing! Sock406, was the 1st upper level course I had taken, I was nervous but he made the class easy & didn't lose me in all the mat.(u will read a lot)! He will explain but expects u to think critically. Communication is easy w/ Dr. W as long as u try and ask q's he will work w/ u! Inspiring and understanding!
                
                   I took Mr. White for Race & Ethics and Stratification and Inequality. Expect to read and write in these classes.  Expect to know and learn useful information. The instructor was helpful, detailed, fair, and just. If your up for a challenge and want to gain knowledge in Sociology, I recommend this course.
                
                   Still made a good grade, but this professor is not very open to conservative viewpoints. The class was very easy but there is a lot of writing and getting the book is a good idea, even though I squeaked by with an A without the book there were several times I needed it. Thank god for google. If you can take anybody else, do it. I couldn't stand it.
                
                   Very dedicated to his work.  Be prepared to think harder than you thought possible!
                
                   I took the Race of Ethics class. He is a awesome teacher. There is alot of reading, but the books that he assignment to read will keep your attention. One of the books was call &quot;Come hell or High water&quot;, Love it will keep the book for my kids to read. That how good the book is. He explain  his assignment very well. Read your books and study.
                
                   I took the Race of Ethics class.  The class has a lot of writing assignments.  However, the information taught in the class is very interesting.  The assignments and tests aren't hard.....just time consuming.  I would recommend this class to everyone.  It should be a requirement.
                
                   Dr. Dietert is a tough grader and the class will test your writing skills. There are no tests but If you're knowledgeable about writing in the social sciences then you will do well. Otherwise, I would steer clear. If you do succeed in her class, however, she is very supportive and you will no doubt learn the material well and enjoy the class!
                
                   I know I'm not the best writer and there is room for improvement.  All the classes that I take are centered around writing and in none of those did I receive such harsh comments on my writing like I did from Dietert.  She is a very hard grader and expects you to be expectional in order to even get a B.  I failed the class. DON'T DO IT!
                
                   Stay away if you can! I did NOT care for her at all. She is a very hard grader. I am usually a straight A student but now I am not. She expects ALOT from you and doesn't give you much feed back on how to improve. Good luck if you have to take her. 
                
                   Dr. Dietert is SUPER nice. She really cares about her students and their performance. She is amazing at getting things graded and giving you feedback to improve. She really wants you to learn. She is very flexible as long as you work had or at least show that your care and are trying. She makes this class really interesting.
                
                   Dr. Dietert is funny, engaging, and understanding. Her class was inspiring, enlightening, and relevant. I highly recommend her class. What a great professor!
                
                   She is very involved with her students and always available for assistance. I highly recommend her to anyone needing to or wanting to take a course that she teaches.
                
                   Dr. Dietert was the absolute BEST instructor I have EVER had in an online class. She was very involved with all of the db posts and always answered her emails quickly and provided grades and feedback on assignments quickly.  The quizzes were not great for this subject, but she advised she is doing away with them in the future. HIGHLY RECOMMEND her!
                
                   If you don't know much about this subject, you will after taken this class. Very good teacher. She loves her job and her students. She is Awesome! There is alot of reading and writing in this class. The books she picks are the kind that you will learn something that you didn't know.
                
                   The amount of reading is typical for college courses. The course is provocative and interesting and the professor is more than willing to discuss things with you if you need clarification. She is very nice and supportive. Don't be fooled, just because this an elective doesn't mean it's an easy A.
                
                   This class required a lot of critical thinking about the subject matter.  Though there was quite a bit of work envolved, I think it really facilited understanding of the concepts and objectives of the chapters.  I was frustrated at times by the massive amount of reading each week but I know I learned more from this class than other online ones.
                
                   Too much homework even for an on-line course. I've taken plenty of on-line courses and this Instructor is probably the worse in the amount of homework given.  Plus she never grades the forum work so you really do not know where you stand.  I guess she can't even keep up with the grading because of all the homework she gives.
                
                   CRIM 3302 SOCIAL DEVIANCE  She is a hard grader, but for the smallest things. For each chapter we had to answer 6 questions, doesn't sound hard huh? Well she expects a half a page for each question. This was supposed to be a hybrid class, nope had to come in on my days off to take the test in the computer room finial paper was 16-20 pages long.
                
                   We learn more from the book than from her. Her lectures don't correlate with the book. Gets off topic easily. Too opinionated about subjects. Refuses to listen to students that don't agree with her. She is inconsistent with her grading.  Is not clear about assignments. Her tests are horribly set up. Teaches on her own methods and tests on that.
                
                   I would NEVER take her class again! She's confusing for everyone including herself her tests are horribly difficult and she doesn't review AT ALL. She gets off topic easily and then you miss info needed for tests. BE READY TO TYPE 12 ESSAY QUESTIONS A WEEK AND PRINT NONSTOP! 
                
                   Horrible professor!!! Teaches nothing and expects you to know everything!!
                
                   Don't make the mistake I did by taking her in a graduating semester. She teaches her class as if it's a mandatory course for graduation. She also does not realize that everyone taking her class is NOT trying to be a sociologist like her. As a former teacher/ military instructor she is horrible at understanding her students. Never again,
                
                   All those bad posts are wrong & were probably rated by lazy people expecting an easy A. This is a university,not high school! She knows her stuff & is straightforward with her answers. Although she may not sugar coat anything, she is professional & respectful. If you're a cry baby that likes sugar, go cry in another class. She's inspiring.
                
                   The hardest class I have EVER taken. Very respectful & she was always available to answer questions. LOTS of info. Enjoyable lectures, very interesting, extremely knowledgeable, & class was geared toward the social aspect of JuvDel. A bit biased toward the Sociology field of study (her PhD.), but she opened my mind to a lot of knowledge. NICE!
                
                   Dr. Torres-Raines is the most unprofessional professor I have ever taken. She is rude, un- organized and does not know the material that she is required to teach. I have seen her yell at students, and encourage others to drop her classes. She does not belong at any institution where there is teaching and patience required.
                
                   RUN RUN RUN RUN RUN! There's a reason why every single one of her classes has vacancies during registration. The most work/writing of my college career and its Sociology! sociology! Awful teacher, teaches nothing and EXPECTS you to know everything. Take anyone or ANYTHING else to avoid her. Transfer colleges, move out of the country, anything! RUN!
                
                   Avoid taking this professor for any of the classes that she teaches.  Her lessons are not clear nor are the directions for most of the work that she assigns.  She often confuses the classes that she teaches and answers most questions with rude rebuttles.
                
                   Her "hybrid" class requires 8 essay questions per chapter (that's 32 essay questions per test). When raising concerns about anything, she flat out tells you she will never change.  Gave us an exam over Thanksgiving. Gets mad when you don't do extra credit. She is the worst teacher of all time.
                
                   She's a beast! Hers is the hardest class I have ever taken in my life. If you cherish your GPA, don't take her class. No one in our class got an A on any of her tests. The highest grade was an 80! She argues with students, interjects bias and doesn't seem to really understand what she's teaching.  It's a mess!
                
                   Just a few major changes would create a better learning environment. Heed student suggestions, especially when so many feel the same about one professor. It's a good time to ask "how can I improve?" Why create such a stressful setting that students (of all ages and learning abilities) want to quit because the expectations are too unreasonable.
                
                   Her lectures are very unstructured and biased. She seems to go off topic everytime she lectures in class. Plus, she adds on a bunch of writing assigments on top of this, so all in all, it's a very stressing class. I would recommend to avoid her at all costs!
                
                   I took this professor once and only once.  She was nice to me, but I had to tune her out and just study the handouts in class.  She is very biased and shows it in her comments and her grades.  Her name is not placed on the registration lists because people know not to take her class.  The school knows about the complaints and still continues to kee
                
                   lots of reading and students do teach the class. her lectures are difficult to understand and not very clear. I would take another professor for this course. do the extra credit it will help you pass
                
                   She says that her notes are what we needed to study for the test & not to rely on the book. After the 1st test, she said you need to use the book, not notes. Short answers say list/define/short description, which means 3 paragraphs ea. She's not clear. You teach the class for her. I couldn't take essays home for credit but she allowed others to.
                
                   ALL OF THESE COMMENTS ARE TRUTH, EXCEPT THE GOOD ONES. WORST PROF. I'VE EVER HAD! SHE LECTURED TWICE THE WHOLE SEMESTER; SHE ASSIGNED GROUPS & THEY PRETTY MUCH TAUGHT THE CLASS. TESTS ARE IMPOSSIBLE TO PASS. THE CLASS WAS A HYBRID CLASS, BUT SHE DIDN'T ANSWER EMAIL OR ACCEPT ANYTHING THROUGH EMAIL....HOW IS SHE STILL TEACHING&#63;!
                
                   i liked her she know her model she can be very helpful if you give her a chance
                
                   Wow! Students beware. This professor should not be teaching. Students are grouped and then THEY teach the class, 2 chapters per group. Impossible to learn anything and her exams are impossible to pass. She has a following of a few female students, other than that- she is NOT a fav on campus. Sometimes, she doesn't even know which class we are!!
                
                   This professor is nothing but frustrating. She didn't decide on what book she wanted to use until the forth week of class. Her expectations are unattainable unless you have no other classes and nothing else to do. Just a scatterbrained, student taught class with an unorganized and demanding professor. 298 concepts and nine essays in six days, yeah
                
                   Requires a lot of time and effort. Listen carefully to watch she says. Learn and Study the handouts she provides. Read the Book! Always show up to class! Difficult exams, so do the extra credit!
                
                   Once you have had her you will understand the format for her classes. Do what she tells you. Learn the theories and memorize the model. She has a lot of knowledge and experience. If you are looking for an easy A, don't take her. If you plan to attend graduate school, take her!
                
                   Stats was tough at first and then at the end was easy. You do have online quiz every week , so beware. As long as you study you will be ok.. Took him twice and made "A's". He is hilarious, and have any questions ask him. 
                
                   Attendance does matter because it is part of grade. Ask questions and he knows the answer, if not he gets back to you.  Stats was very hard for me at first, at the end was easy group project. Lectures are great. Took Dr. Simpson twice.
                
                   Dr. Simpson is such a great professor. He really tries to engage the class as much as possible. He is pretty particular about what he wants. Just make sure to communicate with him and you should do well in the class. I would take this professor again.
                
                   Dr. Simpson is an awesome professor. He is the best I've ever had since I have been at TAMUSA. Most interesting class ever! His class was eye opening to many of social issues that impact water. We all left his class with a different outlook on society. I took the summer hybrid class which consisted of 10 online discussions, 3 field reports, and an investigative report/power point. Did I mention we took field trips?
                
                   Great Professor, knows his stuff! HE is very intelligent and it was a great class, you will learn so much from him.  You must attend classes because his lectures are a must. The info is hard, but he will work with you, if he knows you! Go to class, do your assignments, pay attention.
                
                   Professor Simpson is very awesome and will work with anyone as long as you show that you are trying to get what he is trying to teach. I am taking him for both of his summer courses would decently take him over and over if needed to. I will say this if you try to get out of doing test and stuff it will hurt his feelings and he will get frustrated.
                
                   Easy, if your good with numbers and computers. You have to learn "Stata". 2 tests and 4 assignments. Super cool Prof. goes a little fast for me but takes time to answer questions and he is patient, & respectful.
                
                   Very easy class! daily discussions & no tests! The final is a paper and it's not too hard. Overall great professor and class! Easy A :)
                
                   Only a midterm and a final. Pay attention in class. One extra credit attempt. Homework assignments are easy. Miss more than three classes and you cannot receive an A.
                
                   Very helpful. Weekly discussion and quizzes, both short and simple. Everything you need is in  the book. One final paper and annotated bilb. good instructions on both. Responses very fast to email. Im taking for another class. 
                
                   Professor Schmidt is awesome, I have taken him for 3 classes so far and I am hoping to take him for one more. He leaves work every week, but the work is fairly easy, you just have to dedicate time to do the assignments. He is a very easy grader and very understanding of situations or computer problems just don't push it too far. 
                
                   Course can be challenging, but if you read the book and review the powerpoints, it's not as difficult.  There are weekly quizzes, weekly discussions and journals you must do.  Do not skip a quiz discussions and you'll do great.  Topics are interesting, so that helps.
                
                   He is rude, and unsure of what he wants. He wants everything written in ASA format. His directions on how to write in ASA is confusing, and when you try to ask for help his response is "refer to the syllabus."
                
                   I find it amazing that the university tolerates teachers like her.SO UNHELPFUL!Getting a straight answer from her was like pulling teeth she always had issues w/blkboard so due dates constantly got changed.I wouldn't recommend taking her if you dont have to since you'll basically be teaching yourself b/c god forbid we buren her w/actually teaching
                
                   I have taken over 10 online classes. This is by far the WORST professor ever! Stay away! Good luck trying to get an A, she pretty much gives out bad grades. Her tests are difficult and most of us got very low grades. The test answers had to be messed up in the system... She will not email back either. I could never contact her!! DO not take her
                
                   very disorganized. Many in class actually believed she gave students bad grades on purpose. Class asked her to release test and answers after we all got fed up with her tests so we could cross reference and she refused. Always changing dates for assignments and syllabus was wrong, she doesn't even follow it. I'd recommend taking another professor.
                
                   Worse teacher ever. I honestly believe she would give people low grades on purpose. Took class online. When students got fed up they asked her to release the questions and answers to the test so we could see what we got wrong and she refused. She is very disorganized, and not a very good professor. I would highly recommend taking another professor.
                
                   The subject is interesting but the class is all over the place. Due dates constantly changing. The tests are hard and tricky questions..quizzes also. She gives a few essays over movies pertaining to the book. Even if you try to get an A, you most likely won't. I tried so hard and got Bs and Cs as other students also. She emails back and seems nice.
                
                   This class was not really hard but a bit disorganized. I had a hard time figuring out where the rubric was and when assignments were assigned or due. The syllabus was wrong. Other than that professor seemed very nice. I think that if it was a live class instead of online professor awesome. Great connections with topic and real life.
                
                   Another SOCI nightmare at TAMUSA. Her online class is a confusing mess. No discussions as mentioned on the syllabus for extra credit. Just a bunch of essays and tests. She constantly changes dates, too.
                
                   She dosent teach anything she just shows movies. The problem is her test are hard.  She is a Socialist so watch out!!!
                
                   It was a very interesting class. I honestly thought she was hard, well her tests were. She gave a few essays and there was a group presentation. She was overall okay. just mak sure she's familiar with u, and do ur work! She is wicked halarioius! class was fun because we talked about many issues. Always try to participate!
                
                   Professor O, is really a good teacher. She teaches on the dry eraser board,keep those notes because they''ll show up on test. She also shows videos in conjunction with what is being taught. Test are almost straight from the chapters and some notes. I have her for two classes this semester, and If I need something else she teaches, I will choose her
                
                   Teaches the same thing for all her classes (for the most part). Save your notes from prior classes. Does not go over the chapters whatsoever however the tests are straight from the chapters. Questions are worded tricky. Class is interesting though. Papers/assignment are in conjunction w/ videos.
                
                   The class is very helpful to understand how to handle any job field situations, learn people skills and network to to find a job. She is very laid back, you just need to turn in anything that is assign on time
                
                   This professor is encouraging and wonderful at what she does. She is always there to answer any questions whether they are for the class or for a future career. I am taking her again next semester! 
                
                   I love this professor.  Very nice and is always there to answer any questions.
                
                   She is an amazing professor. She really does care about her students. Just make sure to communicate with her and you should do well.
                
                   I have taken her once before and received an A, I missed two assignments and because of this I made a B. So, do your work and you should make an A. She is a great Professor! I will be taking her again, and again and again!
                
                   Professor Perez is great! I have taken her twice online and both times have been good experiences. She keeps us updated on grade, always is announcing and emailing us information. Her class follows the syllabus to the T. weekly discussions, tests, essays. Do the work and you can earn an A. :)Take her!
                
                   The workload was difficult, but not impossible. Dr. Celik makes herself available for the class for questions or help. This was the most difficult class I've had here, but I've learned so much because of her.
                
                   This class was the most difficult for me this semester. Though the workload was intimidating at times, it's not impossible. Dr. Celik makes herself available to help you at all times. She loves her work and I learned so much because of her. Her passion for her work really rubs off on you and makes you strive to do your best in the class.
                
                   This is probably the most challenging course I ever took, but she is the best and the most intelligent professor I have ever had in my college life. I learned a lot in her courses. She required us to deliver a presentation for each writing assignment that was followed by class discussions.  Too bad A&M is losing her because she is moving
                
                   In all years at A&M, I didn't have another professors who was as invested as Prof Celik in her students. She requires a research project, a book review, and article presentations in her course. The workload is demanding, but she provides the most feedback to help you improve your work. For a student who is serious in her studies, she is a bliss.
                
                   Stay away! She is confusing, unclear and did not post grades until after 10 weeks! She changed syllabus 3 times and hardly taught anything. She expects students to read a lot, which is fine, but expects students to teach the other students based on textbook. Very strict grading and seemingly insatiable expectations.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Great teacher
                
                   Very helpful. Answers all questions in an applicable and understandable manner. Does not degrade anyone. Makes class interesting and short. Understands that it's a required/intro class so does not make it overly difficult. Only 2 exams (mid & final) +SHORT research paper + a few movie/homework assignments. Easy A+ AND you learn! :)
                
                   He is a very good professor. He has never deprived anyone of his assistance and is very helpful whenever a student needs it
                
                   Fun, easy class. Professor is laid back. Most class days are either movies that you will be writing a paper on (only one page, very simple) or going over notes and getting released 20 minutes after class starts. I would recommend this to people like me, who need it in their degree plan for no apparent reason (I'm a ChemE) and want an easy A.
                
                   A nice guy, super super easy. Show up, do your work and you will pass. You dont even really have to do it well, just turn it in! He even gives you the darn tests to review before quizs.
                
                   He gives all students "practice tests" before the real test--the questions are the same on both tests!! ..You must read on your own or else you will do bad on tests ..Cool professor who gives students second and third and fourth chances!! I LOVE THIS GUY!!!
                
                   Great professor
                
                   I look forward to his class. He takes things he has learned in his lifetime and incorporates it into lecture. He's pretty easy.
                
                   You will get a A, but beat your head aganist the wall all semester because of his stupidity!
                
                   He gives all students &quot;practice tests&quot; before the real test--the questions are the same on both tests!! ..You must read on your own or else you will do bad on tests ..Cool professor who gives students second and third and fourth chances!! I LOVE THIS GUY!!!
                
                   Here's the thing : he gives you these scatterbrain reviews for tests and expects you to read the entire chapter and then some just to gain all this information over things that you don't know are even going to be on the test. Very frustrating. So, basically it's easy if you're reading all the chapters and understanding.
                
                   Great Teacher. Knows his stuff. Curves tests well.
                
                   Dr. Domino is the epitome of a Harvard professor! No, he just has high expectations which I think is motivating. His standards are high but man can he curve!!! I love it! I love Dr. D eventhough we have our bickering moments, I just hope he was a good choice to put down as one of my references!!!!
                
                   Dr. Domino is a hoot!  He is quite the flirt too, but you can't help but love this man!  His classes are interesting, he has a great personality, and though he may be somewhat demanding, he's really a softie at heart.
                
                   You either love this man as a teacher or you don't. People easily confuse his sarcasm for insults. Not the easiest teacher around, but a rewarding one. Take a class by him and you WILL learn things.
                
                   Made an interesting subject boring. Unhelpful with degree plan.
                
                   Class attendance is mandatory since at least 1/2 the questions come from either lecture or presentations. His online study guide by chapter helps focus the reading to pick the key elements out of each assignment. The assignments were not excessively easy, however they only required a few hours at a time about 3 times during a semester.
                
                   One of my all time favorite professors! His class does require you to be present but this is true with all classes I have taken. He knows his stuff and doesn't expect you to agree with his ideas about the subject matter. Some professors want you to learn via their thoughts and ideas, Dr. Ramirez is not like that. Will definitely take him again!
                
                   This professor drones on & on. Everyone seems to be doing badly in his class; only way to do well is to worship the textbook, which he co-authored, in your essays. I WOULD NOT recommend his class. Very boring lectures and his exams, while half multiple choice are tough because 40 points are based on essays, and he and his graders are picky.
                
                   A lot of work but very easy. He is clear and ver engaging. He is young and can easily relate to you.
                
                   Good teacher, basically read from the slides. Test information is from slides and the book but the reviews are pretty consistent with tests and there are extra credit opportunities. His only fault is that he is not reasonable when grading. I got 89 in class and he would not give that single point, even though going to office and getting help.
                
                   Helpful and nice, not a very hard class but attendance is a must as well as lots of reading.
                
                   Super nice professor.  His classes are not hard but they do require a lot of reading and this was definitely not a &quot;blow off&quot; class.  He showed a lot of interesting movies.  He also has a good sense of humor and is kind of cute.
                
                   AWESOME TEACHER! Very easy as long as you pay attention.
                
                   Dr.Ramirez was new to the school when i had his class. In fact it was his first class at TAMUCC. He is very young looking and has a sense of humor. He needs a bit more teaching experience for my taste.
                
                   Ramirez is so friendly and approachable. His lectures are interesting, shows interesting and relevant films frequently.  There are some writing/homework assignments but they are short.
                
                   Dr. Ramirez' lectures can be kind of dry, but he does shake things up now and then with really interesting topics. Uses powerpoint to outline lecture, so following along is easy. You must read your text-but your in college so that's a given, right&#63; Anyhow, he seems pretty nice and easygoing as well.
                
                   Took Soci of Gender, a 4000 level class and enjoyed it.  Gives lots of small in class assignments to pad your grade and a full week to complete two 4-5 page essays for exams.  I can't believe someone is complaining about having to show up to class. Don't take upper level sociology classes if you can't handle them, they are all writing intensive.
                
                   It is not about being lazy but instead about what a full time student can manage to do. Two prompts with each that has two sections each is just too much! I would try to avoid him as well!
                
                   He's gives everything u need in for the test in the notes so copy them!
                
                   I found Dr. Ramirez to be a breath of fresh air when it comes to profs. He kept the class fun, and even though SOCI is not my major or minor, I found the course to be interesting. The exams are long, but I honestly prefer them to multiple choice exams and he gives you at least a whole week to work on them! If you think they are hard, you're lazy!
                
                   One of my least favorite classes i will not ever take him again! If you like writting over 10pg papers this is the class for you! You will have to do this 3 times and show up to class for daily grade!!! Avoid him!!!
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Loved this class! Topics discussed are interesting and she's very involved with student interaction during class. She provides detailed powerpoints for lectures. Tests are a combo of multiple choice, essay, and open ended (with extra credit questions). Study for them, a lot! Read the book, and don't skip class.
                
                   I loved Dr. Meyer! her tests is easy if you do the study guide. shes a very sweet lady but her class can be boring at times. she posts the powerpoints online so you dont really need to take notes. just make sure you know the textbook definitions of the vocab words
                
                   You're required to read several pages for each chapter and her slides are just the main points from the chapter so class is pretty pointless. Her tests consist of questions that aren't covered in class or in the reading. She's a sweet lady, but the class is terrible.. And I've asked for help multiple times and never get it.
                
                   She is wonderful. She is clear and very smart!
                
                   If you see her available as a professor for any semester REGISTER quick! She is such a sweethart and is very smart.
                
                   This professor is AWSOME and is clearly interested in the subject and that her students pass! The review and notes for our Populations class were clear and very helpful! I look forward to taking her again!!!
                
                   This professor is AWSOME and is clearly interested in the subject and that her students pass! The review and notes for our Populations class were clear and very helpful! I look forward to taking her again!!!
                
                   Difficult class but very nice professor. Her notes and study guides are NOTHING like the test!! you also have to be familiar with the text book readings.
                
                   Myers is an AMAZING teacher. She is very up beat and very interesting to listen to. the material is not the best thing in the world to learn but she has made it fun and interesting. The text book is used alot, and if you want a good grade in the class you really have to READ. But if you do that you will get an A!
                
                   Teacher has a weird personality, sometimes shares too much of personal life.The book is a big part of class, attendence isnt mand. but she does do random assignment days so make sure you dont miss. class wasnt too hard, pretty boring if your not a soci major.
                
                   Dr.Meyer is another interesting personality. She has a morbid sense of humor and is comfortable joking with her students. The material is not too difficult but you do have to do your work.
                
                   I have to disagree with every previously stated comment to some degree. I had her my freshman year and found her to be extremely difficult. Her notes have nothing to do with the study guide, and the study guide has nothing to do with the test. Studying the study guide is useless as the test is nothing like it whatsoever. Do not take her!
                
                   I found her to be very likable and a good professor.  There was some trouble for me with the exams...the multiple choice can be confusing.  I thought she was  incredibly helpful. Be careful on the exams and read EVERYTHING. The textbook, although necessary, only made the material more complicated.  Good luck!
                
                   have taken her for medical soc and research methods- classes do not have me grippin my chair but are effective and stmulating- her foremost quality is that she seems to be such a great person- she puts so much time into her students- i want to send her a damn christmas card
                
                   Loved the class, it was easy...to me anyhow, and intersting and still have one of the most interesting books I have ever read from that class &quot;The McDonaldization of Society&quot;
                
                   Very, very good teacher. She really loves what she teaches and it makes you want to learn more about it. The tests are pretty easy if you study the notes she posts on webct and read the chapters. She is just a really nice lady and will take the time to talk to you about things other than the class.
                
                   Don't take it!  It was sociology of gender and she wanted to make it all about the plight of the mexican american woman (her area of expertise).  I hated it and lost my interest in sociology simply due to this class!  It was my only B during my first two years of college.  I am as sensitive as the next person but when I take a class about sociology of GENDER, I expect to cover GENDER issues in society.. not ONLY racial issues.
                
                   She is a terrible teacher, not only is she boring but she sounds like she doesnt know what shes talking about.(I hope she gets this).
                
                   No Comments
                
                   easy, but can be boring
                
                   Do. Not. Take. Him. Ever! He is a horrible professor! We literally just learned new material and now we only have 2 days to prepare for our Semester Final that consist of 40 multiply choice question, and 2 very heavy essay question. He likes to set his students up to fail. I swear this Professor just wants to ruin students GPA.
                
                   One of my favorite professors by far. He is very culturally aware and brings great perspective to the class. His accent isn't hard to understand at all. His tests can be a tad bit hard, but SI really helps. If you want  a class where you feel like you're learning valuable things applicable to real life, he's perfect. 
                
                   He's an okay professor but I will never take him again. This class is too heavy for a person whos not majoring in sociology. Exams are back to back so you dont even get a chance to fully process the information. some of the material he teaches is not on the test . I hate this class so much! Please save your GPA and do not take Dr. Benibo
                
                   Great lectures. SI helps a lot too.
                
                   I've taken Dr Benibo for four classes, three of those were electives. He is by far the only professor that I have walked out of his courses with useful knowledge and fresh outlooks. His tests are essay format, so be prepared to write, however if you do the study guide you should do well. Don't skip class as all the information will be in lecture.
                
                   Go to class everyday! Its a must if you want to pass his exams! If you dont get al the notes, going to a study session will help! Overall the class was very informative and he really knows his stuff! Only thing i can say is: TAKE NOTES!!
                
                   Preachy and patronizing. Presents very boring lectures. Tries hard to be funny but he's not. Has a noticeable accent but he's understandable.
                
                   Out of all my teachers Benibo has definitely been one of my favorites. It's all lecture but he makes the subject very interesting and he's really funny too. His tests come straight from the notes so as long as you pay attention, come to every class and write good notes its an easy A. I recommend everyone to take his class!
                
                   As a first year student, I had the honor and privilege of having Dr. Benibo for two classes in one semester.  In both classes I was completely focused on his teachings, as he presented the material very professionally. Dr. Benibo is a very intellegent man, & what I learned from him will last me a life-time.  He opened my eyes!
                
                   Dr.Benibo is a really great professor! He is a mine of information and experience and his class is really a cultural experience! I really enjoyed it, though I must say, I think he mentioned at one point that he is a pastor because he does mention God a lot, but not too much to interfere with the info if you're not religious, overall, great prof!!
                
                   Thought for sure that it was going to be the most boring class ever because it has nothing to do with my major but ended up being one of the highlights of the semester! Dr. Benibo is a great professor. Take notes, go to EVERY class, read chapters and you will get an A. I learned so much. Kinda happy now that the university requires you to take it.
                
                   Great professor! Exams are based off material from the book and his lecture. He usually outlines the notes on the board for you so just listen and write what he says and you'll do great.
                
                   Dr. Benibo is one of the greatest professors i've taken. his experiences are just wonderful and very interesting to hear. his class seems hard because he relies heavily on his essay-type exams but it really isn't that bad. i'd probably write down every word he says if i were you. definitely recommend him! Race & Ethnics is a great class to take.
                
                   Dr. Benibo is an AMAZING Professor! His tests are essay form and they are tough but if you learn how to take notes from him (which i did so anyone can) and take the time to do the study guide for his tests, then you can get an A! I would say take at least one of his classes...especially if you  are a Sociology major or minor.
                
                   Dr. B is one of the BEST prof's i have ever had, hands down. ( and i've had a lot) If you are a slacker, you will hate him, if you are a good student you will love him. i took every class of his i could take.His tests are hard but he truly gives you all you need and no busy work, just know the material. Miss u Dr. B : )
                
                   Dr.Benibo is quite an interesting personality. He has jokes and real life experience. He knows his subjects and is a great lecturer. Be prepared to have hand cramps from writing so much down though!
                
                   Good teacher. Expects greatness from students. Expects critical reasoning.
                
                   WRITE DOWN EVERY SINGLE WORD HE SAYS VERBATIM then repeat on the exam. He had a grader a while ago who tipped me off to this and it works. Textbooks were not necessary for me in any of the classes I took with Dr. Benibo.
                
                   I loved his test they were easy if you do the study questions! I will take him for any class he teaches!!!
                
                   He has a heavy accent and expects his students to write word by word what he says because he doesn't have any visuals.  His tests are challenging but mastery is attainable if you do his study guide since that is the exact questions he will use for the test--essay format. Good Luck!
                
                   The class is challenging, and you will have to learn difficult material. However, Dr. Araiza presents collections of data in an interesting way. Do not be afraid to ask questions, because she can only help you understand the material if you talk to her (after class or during office hours. She doesn't like emails, unless you are scheduling a time).
                
                   Araiza is a tough teacher. She is not afraid to call you out if you come in late, leave to go to the bathroom, are falling asleep or on the phone. She is very passionate about teaching this class you must put in the effort to get a good grade. Take her soc1301 class with a triad. Your first year seminar will help with understanding topics and tests
                
                   Araiza is a tough teacher. She is not afraid to call you out if you come in late, leave to go to the bathroom, are falling asleep or on the phone. She is very passionate about teaching this class you must put in the effort to get a good grade.
                
                   DO NOT TAKE ARAIZA
                
                   Dr. Araiza is very enthusiastic about the courses she teaches.  She requires a lot of work, but it's not hard work.  Just keep up with the reading she assigns and take good notes, and you will do fine.  She's also fun to talk to.  And kind of hot.  Definitely enjoyed her class!
                
                   Don't sign up for Dr. A unless you expect to do work, be passionate, or at the very least be interested. She gives you reading that if pay attention to the content will blow your mind. This isn't a hard class it's just one you need to be dedicated to. Like all of her classes.
                
                   Excellent teacher. It is not an easy A class, well it is if you pay attention. Her lectures are VERY interesting and wont put you to sleep. Make sure you read the assigned chapters, that's what the quizzes and tests are over. Tests are short answer, basically tying the readings to the lectures. Fun interesting class!! I recommend it!
                
                   She is one-sided. Everything it seems is based on her opinion rather than the text. I did not enjoy her at all.
                
                   You have to really pay attention in class and have an open mind to learn anything.
                
                   Great professor! Keeps class very interesting by using relevant current events to explain the ideas in the textbook but doesnt necessarily lecture over the material covered. You MUST read the book to do well in the class. ALOT OF WRITING. And ALOT of higher level thinking. Overall, an extremely interesting class to take as long as you keep up.
                
                   Takes herself a little too seriously. Warps lessons with her own opinion frequently.
                
                   She really loves her job, and tells tons of stories in class to get students interested. On her tests, they are either multiple choice or you can chose to write essays. Reading the book is a must if you want to do well in the class. She is probably one of the best teachers at TAMUCC. I would recommend her to anyone taking a sociology class.
                
                   Just do what is assigned. Go to class take notes they help for class! have an open mind! just stay on top of what is due & your grade and you will be okay. i loved this class! even though it was tough.
                
                   She may have been one of the worst professors in my college career. She doesn't really teach broad sociology, she only teaches her opinion on the subject. Its an awful class. Recommend taking psychology if it's just so that you can get core credit out of the way.
                
                   Dr. A is a great teacher who is passionate about what she is teaching. Best advice, show up, take notes, READ, and OPEN YOUR MIND or you'll have a hard time with the material. Do not come in late or use electronics. She'll embarrass you.
                
                   Best Professor I've taken at this university. Her lectures are never boring. She gives alot of extra credit and has a built in curve to ur grade meaning u can make a 105 average. She is also super funny.
                
                   Good Professor, but a hard class for a freshmen to take coming right out of high school. Make sure you understand everything and write everything down. NO LAPTOPS ALLOWED!!
                
                   I really enjoyed her class! It was very interesting.
                
                   The Si sessions help tremendously, go to them! She favors Hispanics and African Americans. Be ready for her to slam white people.
                
                   dr. a is awesome!!! had a lot of fun listening to her lectures. study for the tests! i did good on the first one and thought i'd be okay for the rest....not so much. study up! dont be late for class, she'll hound on ya
                
                   I learned a lot in this class.  I took it as an elective.  It is definitely not a blow-off class, so if you are looking for something easy, keep looking.  This isn't the droid you are looking for.....
                
                   Easy class if you pay attention and take time to work on it
                
                   His grading system is not easily understood; but if you do all assignments on time and meet the course requirements you will do well. You must read and participate no if and but about it. He is willing to help if you are willing to inquire for help.
                
                   When I took this class I thought it would help with my ability to write papers and conduct research on topics. Though that is the nature of this course we didnt really cover much about papers only research. He makes you choose a research topic for your Proposal and then if he doesnt like it he will blow it off and barely give you any credit for it.
                
                   Difficult to understand. Easy to pass, but it's not great if you actually want to learn the material.
                
                   He is very kind, but has terrible English and grammar. If you can understand broken English or Chinese dialects , this is the perfect class.
                
                   This class was very confusing and Prof. Sun provided almost no feedback. Questions were vague and R quizzes were closed. Couldn't see results of quizzes until the class was over. Useless. The Powerpoits had many links to websites rather than provide information needed for class.
                
                   Great and easy class!
                
                   Very interesting and easy class! The teacher is great and if you put some effort into your reading,you are sure to learn and pass with an A.
                
                   If you want to take an online class then this is great, but I signed up for a face to face, and ended up doing most of the work online.  There was no reason to go to class, but he took attendance. He was hard to understand, but the material was interesting and he was very good at providing examples.  There was a lot of work in that class though.
                
                   I did not really like this class. I don't enjoy online classes in general, but I really don't feel that I learned very much.
                
                   Great professor who lays out the lesson plan so that there are no questions.  Use of videos for his class are great, grading time frame is excellent.  Would recommend thisi professor!!!
                
                   I really enjoyed this class because I learned many things about social research.
                
                   I really enjoyed taking this course because the content was understandable
                
                   Dr. Sun is a very efficiant teacher and he fair and knowledgeable in his field. If you have questions he will assist you with answering them. The lectures are provided online after he talks it making it easier for those who cant write as fast. This is a great teacher and I would recommend him anytime.
                
                   Excellent professor, and well- structured course.  I would highly recommend this professor.
                
                   Best professor I have ever had! I have had several classes with Professor Sun.
                
                   Dr. Sun is great! Anthropology is not my most favorite subject but with his online lectures and videos he made the topic interesting. I would recommend him to anyone!
                
                   Dr. Sun was a GREAT professor. He was helpful and everything was very well organized. He provides online lectures of the chapters that really helped me learn the information better. He also stuck to the schedule and was not bad about flip-flopping on due dates. I am expecting to make an A. GREAT class and professor.
                
                   I found this class to be very challenging and highly stimulating. The professor was very well organized and had an extremely effective teaching method. He used many helpful aids throughout the semester (videos, discussions, powerpoints, etc). Overall, I feel like I learned a lot in this course and that it has helped prepare me for future classes.
                
                   Very boring. Couldn't keep me interested in the subject
                
                   Class online was very simple! as long as you stick to your due dates you will be fine! Nothing is accepted late AT ALL! Entire class grade is discussions make sure you read directions for full credit!
                
                   Awesome teacher! Knows her stuff makes the class interesting
                
                   She is awesome, this is the most interesting class I have had she makes the class interact and people seem to love it. At first after reading all those bad comments about her I didn't want it to take her but thank God I did. She does talk soft but it seems like she tries and gets better everyday and if you didn't heard something she will be more than happy to repeat it just ask. Test are easy, class is interesting. Like the way she dresses for her age she is sensual lady. I REALLY RECOMMEND HER
                
                   Class is boring.
                
                   Ugh--is it over yet&#63;!  This was the miserablest class I have EVER HAD and the most self-centered she-man teacher I have ever seen!
                
                   All I have to say is that I absolutely HATE waking up on MWF knowing that 50 minutes of my life will be completely wasted! DR. Matthi had better have an umbrella on those rainy days otherwise she would have drowned by now since she walks around stuck up with her nose pointed up to the space station!
                
                   This is the dumbest woman I have ever seen in a classroom!She likes to hear herself speak only even when she asks a question. She will tell you you are wrong and then go back and say exactly what you said and say it's right. Her grading is shady and unfair so take it at another school since it is re
                
                   ZZZzzzz...is class over yet&#63;
                
                   Egotisitical instructor. More interested in talking about her exploits in the field as opposed to actually teaching. Would avoid her at all costs, but this is difficult to do as she is the onyl instructor for this class and most majors require this course. Oftentimes comes across as condescending.
                
                   Her classes get better when you get involved, ask questions and provide feedback. however, she does not like to be told that she is wrong. i would still recommend her classes. they are do not monopolize your time but expect several random 5-10 min outside assignments
                
                   good gawd this woman is conceited!!! Overall work is ok in easiness, tests are straightforward. Classes are a nightmare but just pretend that your interested in her and never tell her that she is wrong. Ok class.
                
                   Easy but BOOOORING teacher. Gets off track and snaps at students- I waited to finsh all my classes before posting here. No choice I had to have her class,but avoid her if you can.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   She talks TOO SLOW! Seriously....like 5 minutes for one sentence! BUT, the material is interesting and she is one of the better professors at the university. Despite the slowness, I'd take her again.
                
                   Her class was enjoyable.
                
                   Easiest class ever...hardly any quizzes...easy tests...should be the easiest A, except for Soc11, that you will ever get. I hardly had to read the book, but the lectures do get boring at times.
                
                   Professor is very unfair and requires you to change your life last minute for assignments not in the syllabus. Very interesting class but grading is unfair.
                
                   Hard to understand.  Pretty boring.
                
                   She is an excellent lecturer but expects you to read the book.  Her tests are easy
                
                   Lots of discussions and quizzes almost every week, but if you read the chapter, you'll pass.
                
                   Good deal
                
                   I really enjoyed taking Dr. Thompson-Miller. She's really fun and made sociology very interesting. If you take her for honors she expects a lot, but overall the work load is managable. Take her!
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Very good professor! She gives A LOT of extra credit!!!!! Easy A!!! Test are fairly easy if you study the key terms, she gives reviews too! She checks attendance
                
                   If you have to take SOCI, take Shaffer! She was amazing. She would answer any question you had no matter how long it would take and clearly cared about her students. She gives crazy amount of extra credit and the HW answers are either in the slides or the book (which I recommend reading) but they are super easy to find. Would take her again!
                
                   The best teacher ever. I received a 99 in her class. She is the best teacher I ever had. All you need to do in her class is take lecture notes and read the book to clarify what she taught you and you will be fine. Also do the extra credits and attend class to get participation points. 
                
                   Professor Shaffer is awesome! She's very enthusiastic about what she teaches. There 3 are online tests that are fairly simple if you read(shortened readings with key points)and if you take notes during class! She has clicker questions every class that is for attendance& easy online quizzes every week(5 questions max)that you can take multiple times
                
                   NEED to take notes in class! Lectures aren't put up on ecampus unless there wasn't enough class time to cover a certain topic. I typed mine! (TIME SAVER & AWESOME TOOL for the (3) ONLINE exams we had! Participation is taken through iclicker questions. (Doesn't even matter if you get the question right wrong) TAKE HER!! EASIEST SOCIOLOGY PROF! (:
                
                   Very enthused about the subject. Tests online and easy if you can access notes and internet quickly to find answers. Attendance done with iClickers but she still gives 4 free days. Usually weekly quizzes that were straight from lecture notes. I barely paid attention in lecture and ended up with an A in the class. Highly recommend for an easy A
                
                   IClicker attendance is taken but it only ends up being about 0.3% of your final grade so it isn't really necessary.  The class was extremely easy and I never showed up.  The tests are online and are open notes, I earned full credit if not a high A on all of them. There are a handful of video assignments, quizzes, etc. along with the tests. 
                
                   I definitely deserved the grade I got. She takes attendance everyday using an iClicker. Tests are online, but still hard (averages in the low 80s). The one legitimate problem I had with her was how she performed her lecture; slides aren't put up after, she talks a million words a minute, and asks a lot of philosophical questions with no answer.
                
                   THIS CLASS IS SUPER EASY!!! I would highly recommend taking it if you are taking many tough classes because it WILL boost  your average. The tests are online, open note, and questions are taken straight from lecture notes. The weekly reading quizzes are a breeze (just don't forget about them!). There is an abundance of bonus points and assignments.
                
                   class was super easy because tests were online and final we got a cheat sheet. class is pretty boring and she's sort of annoying but take it because you can use your notes on the easy online tests. weekly assignments too but you can take as many times as you want. also gives lots of extra credit opportunities. super easy class hard not to make an A
                
                   Took Intro to Sociology with him..not a bad prof but his exams were pretty hard. Most of the exams is based on class lectures so you actually have to attend class and take notes. Barely any material from the book is used on the exams.
                
                   Theory course, he threatens students and makes a strange attempt at using Socratic method. Class was on edge, students had to go to happy hour to wind down after class at 9am. Dealing one-on-one he was actually very pleasant.
                
                   great teacher...soci of law too hard for most so beware...find it funny that others cliam he may be liberal b/c seems quite conservative to other students so i would ignore any post about a possible bias.
                
                   sociolgy class, turned liberal 101, made us read &quot;Work Of Nations&quot;.  what a Joke
                
                   If you want to Learn, by first reading and then being forced to think for yourself.  Then this is the teacher for you.  If you want to be a  potted plant  and only throw up answers on tests on multiple choice tests,I would suggest someone else.
                
                   Good  professor. She grades fairly. Make sure you take detailed notes. She does have some health issues , so a lot of times she is not at her office hours. That's not her fault, so I don't blame it on her. It was a great class overall. I learned a lot. I recommend this class. Although she does not count attendance, you will NOT pass if you skip . 
                
                   You definitely need to come to class and take good detailed notes. Read all of the books and know specific facts! The tests are online and you get to use your books and notes. Dr. Moore knows a lot and wants you to do well. Just don't slack off or get behind on readingwatching videos.  
                
                   TAKE HER CLASS. I am so, SO glad that I took this class with her, it was amazing. She is the best professor that I've ever had. There are reading assignments that lead up to a open note test that you just have to be detailed on but she gives us the material in the lectures too. I LOVED going to this class, never missed it.
                
                   don't take this class if you are a historian.  she gets a bit preachy and likes to throw out personal opinions as historical fact.
                
                   She's very passionate and EXTREMELY smart! She has a law degree from one of the top 20 Law Schools!  She doesn't post notes so you HAVE to go to class! She does take home exams that require your class notes and textbook readings. She's awesome!
                
                   Refers to herself as Ghetto, and doesn't realize how offensive that is!!!!
                
                   Great prof, takes a legal approach which gives a great societal perspective of how embedded social inequality becomes in our institutions. Amazingly knowledgeable about subject area.
                
                   nice lady, but sometimes the lectures are boring. Read the book and use the online website to study for your quizzes. not a hard class at all if you read the book.
                
                   I loved this class. It was easily my favorite class. I would highly recommend taking this. You do have to read, but the readings are interesting mostly, and they are vital to class discussions. Going to class is fun, and this was the one class I never dreaded going to. 
                
                   Mackin is an awesome professor. He kept class interesting. I didn't know what sociology would be like, but I enjoyed it because of him. He takes attendance but it helps your grade, just go. Tests are super easy. Lowest grade I made was a 92. Just go to class and you will barely have to study. Great teacher, great class, easy A!
                
                   Mackin is a great professor. I was very excited to sign up for soci of religion. However, it wasn't what I expected at all. It was very difficult. He is a great teacher and I recommend him to all of my friends taking soci 205. I did okay in 326. I enjoyed taking his 205 class more. He is passionate about 326 and fun to listen to.
                
                   He is such a great guy! Really great professor, passionate about what he teaches. If you are a freshman with no background in sociology, DO NOT TAKE SOCIOLOGY OF RELIGION. Although Dr. Mackin is nice and all, the material is confusing and the sociology jargon is hard to follow
                
                   Dr. Mackin is a great professor. I highly recommend to anyone, especially freshman. His test come straight from notes and the only reading you have to do is in the Context Reader, which are little short essays that are kinda interesting. Attendance gives you extra points at the end of the semester! Class gets easier as year goes on.
                
                   Attendance is highly recommended because he takes attendance (every absence counts as -5 points) and he doesn't post the lectures. He also gives extra credit to people who answer questions from the readings. Taking notes during class, participating, showing up, and studying moderately will get you an easy B. The 3 exams are somewhat hard so study!
                
                   He's really enthusiastic about the material, and most of the time it is very interesting. A lot of the the material is pretty easy & he gives extra credit at the end of the semester
                
                   Really enjoyed this class. He cares alot about the topics and makes it interesting. Only a midterm and a final, so if you do poorly on one you are in a tough place. Go to class take notes. Gives a chat before each test, print and read. If I had done the extra credit I would have gotten an A. So do it.
                
                   You just take notes, and that is what the test is over, only 4 grades or 4 tests, study and youll make a B.
                
                   Her lectures weren't that different from her slides (which she put on ecampus before class). Her tests were really short and sometimes confusing.. She was nice, and her class wasn't hard, but I wouldn't want to take her again
                
                   Material is very easy to understand, but her tests are very strange and sometimes questions were asking about things I had never seen in the textbook or lecture slides. This was a problem because tests were only worth 30 points a piece, so missing a question or two gives you a B automatically. Also her lectures are extremely boring and long.
                
                   One of the best professors I've ever had. She explains everything thoroughly, all you have to do is pay attention and take notes. Tests are challenging, but if you study well and know the material, you'll do fine. The group project is a pain, but she is extremely helpful and gives clear, detailed instructions for every part. Highly recommend.
                
                   Amazing prof who knows what she's talking about. Decades of experience and nearly perfected teaching technique. The group project is helpful. Don't have to read much or write a whole lot, but must pay attention in lectures and understand the material well. Best prof I've ever had. 
                
                   amazing teacher really know what she is talking about. Test are very hard. she expects you to know and understand every little detail. The group project is a huge pain but it counts for a test grade which can help. Be prepared to put in LOTSSS of work to get an A
                
                   No Comments
                
                   She is so wonderful, decided to change majors to Sociology after having her.
                
                   She's great! Very energetic and brought her dog to class almost every day. She grades harder than most might expect but is very fair and an A is very do-able just actually put in the effort to study and do the online discussions. She gives in class quizzes over the readings occasionally but will drop the two lowest. HIGHLY SUGGEST!
                
                   energetic
                
                   He's a good instructor. Make sure you read the textbook though because half of his questions come from it for tests.  I'm not even kidding.  You have to read all the chapters.  I found the test questions to be confusing and written in a way that was hard to distinguish an answer, but if you read, take notes, and study, you're guaranteed a B for sur
                
                   Hes pretty easy and cool.  Dont just go off lecture, you do have to keep up with readings.  Read every chapter you should be fine.  Even if you skip every day,read chapters and dont attend lecture, you will do fine on the test.
                
                   Boring lectures, sometimes funny. English isn't his 1st language, so it's not always easy to understand him. Randomly takes attendance, & it's for a grade. There are only 2 tests, & 2 writing assignments which are very vague, yet toughly graded. He offered extra credit for our class because everyone did so bad. He's a nice guy but not very helpful.
                
                   Lectures are straight from the PowerPoint slides. Show up to class everyday and accumulate points to your grade easily. The textbook isn't a must have, but it does help. Class is either really boring or really interesting there's no in between. I learned many new things! 
                
                   I took sociology expecting to actually learn something. His lectures are boring. He just stands in one place and talks. His power point's aren't specific. His assignments are very vague and open ended, where it could be answered in many different ways. But he won't give you credit unless you have exactly what he wants. Office hours are useless. 
                
                   DO NOT TAKE HIM! His lectures are extremely boring & to make it worse his voice is monotone and he fragments his sentences sometimes,which makes it hard to understand what he says. I learned more from reading the textbook than I did attending lecture. Grades consist of 2 tests, 2 short essays, extra credit (maybe), & attendance taken randomly.
                
                   Dr. Hernandez is a great professor! He may try to scare you away the first day of class, don't worry, he does it to make sure you take the class seriously. His lectures are the best I have had. Keeps it entertaining and aims to make you think critically. May get uncomfortable with some of the topics. READ the readings/clips BEFOREHAND (for tests).
                
                   I would not recommend this prof. First day of class he gives reasons to get out of his class and I regret not doing that! Unless you have plenty of time to read boring articles and take extremely detailed notes then do not take him. There are other profs that are better/easier for sociology. I absolutely could not stand him and he ruined the class.
                
                   one of the best professors i've had at TAMU! His lectures were usually interesting  (no textbook) all reading links provided on ecampus DO THE READINGS/WATCH THE VIDEOS AND TAKE NOTES ON THEM he likes calling you out in class to talk about them  the papers/Critical responses were fairly easy he is the reason i changed my major to sociology :)
                
                   Great teacher. Just be prepared for an ungodly amount of outside readings that can take up to 2 hours for one article. Take explicit notes on these readings, YOU WILL NEED THEM. Tests are very detailed and involve multiple choice, essays, and short answers. Attendance is highly recommended. Gives lots of extra cerdit. 
                
                   Very boring class. Lectures are long, and grading can be subjective sometimes.
                
                   She was a fantastic professor for Popular Culture. I thoroughly enjoyed her class and would take it again if I could. There were 2 papers, 4 discussion questions, and 4 PowerPoint presentations. All of these were very easy; she was an easy grader. This course was an easy A. She was very sweet and approachable!
                
                   This class was really easy if you get a study group to prepare for the tests together. The tests weren't hard, just not much time to take them. The final paper was really easy. Discussions are really easy too. Basically if you do everything on time you should make a decent grade. 
                
                   I really enjoyed her class! She is a bit monotone, but honestly everything that you need to know for the tests are on the powerpoint slides. She gives you a study guide before the exam that basically is the exam. If you miss class though, I wouldn't count on her putting the notes online. Really though, the material is easy and she is very nice. 
                
                   She's very monotone and doesn't really engage with the students. She doesn't post lectures online, so you have to go to class if you want the material for the review. She seems like a nice lady, but she just isn't interesting.
                
                   I felt like I was watching a high school student present a project everyday. Never went into any depth during the lectures, she just read straight off the powerpoints with a soft voice that would put anyone to sleep. She seems to have no enthusiasm about the class and made the coolest subject the most boring class I have ever taken. Hard tests!
                
                   I do well with how she teaches. Learned a lot. Good class.
                
                   This class was great. Dr. Field always takes his time explaining topics and won't let you fall behind. Math is not my strongest subject but taking his class has made me way better at statistics. 
                
                   Great professor! I actually ended up failing his course, but he worked with me to bump up my grade to passing. He's very understanding and has excellent teaching skills and demonstrations. If you struggle AT ALL, go to his office hours. He is super cool and down to earth. He'll help with you just about anything.
                
                   I loved Layton! Such a nice guy and really cared about his sociology. His slides were very clear and he taught you what was most important from the book but he didnt post them online. Class was mandatory for his clicker quizzes, he usually asked opinions. Also needed to read for his online quizzes but those werent hard. Overall a pretty easy class!
                
                   Professor Field is a pretty good professor. His class is a bit challenging, or at least his tests are. Sociology is a dull subject for me, but he tried to make the class interesting and innovative. Attendance is mandatory and he expects you to read the book (I didn't and made a B). There were 3 tests in total and we'd occasionally have quizzes.
                
                   He's is an expert in this field and is amazingly helpful to all students undergrad or graduate. It seems like he has read every book ever written and effectively passes on the knowledge to his students.
                
                   Awesome teacher. Her tests were harder than some of the other classes I've taken, but she was very friendly and helpful. She made every lecture very interesting and the class was open for discussion. we had to do one presentation but as long as you followed the guidelines you would be fine. We also watched a lot of films.
                
                   Dr. Farris is by far one of the best professors I have encountered!
                
                   As long as you attend class and do the work, it is fairly easy to make an A. He is an awesome prof... made class very enjoyable.
                
                   Two tests- super easy because he gives review before with all of the questions that will be on the exam! Made A's on both! However I did not enjoy his lectures-attended all but attendance obviously isnt necessary for an A. they were super complex and just made me confused. he is VERY smart but It was much better explained in the book lol
                
                   Great teacher! very passionate about his job, cares about students. Often cancels class and discussion groups. Test reviews are question by question what you need to know! Take his class its great!
                
                   He was great! He gives reviews for his quizzes and exams. All you have to do is go to lecture, read the material, and do the reviews. An A is super easy to get. You can tell he's passionate about what he's teaching. This keeps the class interesting. I highly recommend this prof.
                
                   Extremely nice and funny teacher. Is willing to help in any way possible, super laid back. Take him
                
                   Very intelligent
                
                   Great class. Great Professor.
                
                   Tests are not hard, gives you a study guide prior to exam. Only readings, no major textbooks needed also. Everything he says makes sense, if it doesn't he does a good job with clarifying it if necessary. Not a bad class to take!
                
                   I took him for WMST 200 and he was an excellent prof. sometimes his lectures went off on a tangent but you can tell he really loves what he's teaching and he is always available for interesting and helpful conversations. he gives reviews before each quiz (no exams) and the quizzes are very similar to the review. he's great, and highly recommended!
                
                   good teacher, gets really into his lectures but they are interesting. readings are everynight, but he explains them very well. test are not too difficult if you go to class most of the time.
                
                   He is a good teacher.  Clear and easy comprehend.  Sometimes he can get slightly boring, but usually it is easy to pay attention.  Attendance and good note-taking are important.  The tests are all multiple choice and basically straight from the notes.  There is a moderate amount of reading required for the class, but not too much in my opinion.
                
                   Anybody saying she's a feminist is first off wrong, she believes in female and racial domination over white men. She also despises Texas and WT. But she does know what she's talking about government wise, the class goes by super quick because you just laugh at her the whole time, and it's stupid easy. 
                
                   I took Ms. Stravato for Texas Government expecting to learn about how awesome our state is. Instead, the whole semester was about how aweful Texas is-and the book even backed it up! She is a very liberal feminist and will force her views on you. Anyone else's opinion is just wrong and stupid, and she will let you know. Very depressing, negative lad
                